DK 



CORNELL 
UNIVERSITY 



LIBRARY 



T 




Given in Memory of 
JACOB AND MARY TUVIN 



BY 



JULIUS H. TUVIN, '12 



DATE DUE 




m:.:- '^^ 




'HI 



' -^ ' v 15- 







uu 




I % ^ . s^ - 




3 1924 028 351 439 



aim 




Cornell University 
Library 



The original of this book is in 
the Cornell University Library. 



There are no known copyright restrictions in 
the United States on the use of the text. 



:h 



http://www.archive.org/details/cu31924028351439 



UNIFORM WITH THIS VOLUME 

DEMOCRACY 

AND 

THE PRESS 



BY 

F. H. HAY WARD, D.Lit.. B.Sc 

and 
B. N LANGDON-DAVIES. MA. 



1/6 & 2/6 net. 

Other Books in the LLP. Library 
vodl follow in due course. 



The national LABOUR PRESS, Ltd. 

30. Blackfriars Street, Manchester: 
and at 8 & 9, Johnson s Court, Fleet Street. 
London. E.C.4. 



THE DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 



/, 



I J^P. LIBRARY 

THE 



DICTATORSHIP 



OF THE 



PROLETARIAT 



BY 

KARL KAUTSKY 



TRANSLATED BY H. J. STENNING 



THE NATIONAL LABOUR PRESS. LTD., 

30, Blackfriars Street, Manchester, 
and at London and Leicester* 



'Wi" 



"9900 




I 



1 



7? 



>h) 



iCi. 



EDITOR'S PREFACE TO THE ENGLISH 

EDITION 



Karl Kautsky, the author of " The Dictatorship of the 
Proletariat, ' ' of which an English translation is now sub- 
mitted to the public, is the most eminent Socialist writer 
of the Continent. 

Kautsky is 65 years of age, was bom in Austria, and has 
lived most of his life in Germany. He resided in London, 
in close association with Friedrich Engels, from 1885 to 
1890, and studied daily at the British Museum. 

For more than thirty years Kautsky has served Inter- 
national Socialism with high literary ability, great learn- 
ing, and unusual aptitude for sociological research. 

Students of economics owe him a heavy debt for the 
laborious and difficult work of editing the literary remains 
of Karl Marx. In 1882, Kautsky, in partnership with 
another, founded the Neue Zeit, from the editorship of 
which he was deposed by the German Majority Socialists 
in May, 1918. His various books have been translated 
into many European languages, and have been an 
important factor in the education of the European working 
classes. By way of recreation from his political and 
economic duties, Kautsky employed his scanty leisure in 
the study of Christian origins, and some ten years ago 
published " The Origirr of Christianity," one of the most 
fascinating books on that subject ever written.- 



6 PREFACE 

The present examination of Bolshevism was written by 
Kautsky in the latter part of 1918, and pubHshed in 
Vienna. Soon after the outbreak of the German political 
revolution of a year ago, about one-half of the matter 
contained in "The Dictatorship of the Proletariat" was 
issued by a Berlin publisher under the title, '* Democracy 
Id* Dictatorship." 

The Russian Bolsheviks have had the most difficult task 
ever placed in human hands, and though it is yet too 
early to pass a final judgment upon their success or 
failure, the evidence at present available points to the 
conclusion that they have accomplished wionderful 
achievements. Lenin himself is the first to admit that 
they have made misitakes. It could not be otherwise. 
In his letter to the Hungarian Communists he warns them 
not to attempt to copy too closely the methods which 
have been adopted in Russia. Socialism will learn as 
much from the failures as from the successes of these 
first efforts to establish Socialism in a great community. 

The forms of government and administration most suit- 
able for a period of transition , and in economic and 
political conditions so different from those which exist in 
the Western coimtries, cannot be accepted without ques- 
tion as the most appropriate and effective for other 
countries and for other circumstances. The readiness 
with which some British Socialists have embraced the 
idea of the Soviet form of government as being the new 
democracy and capable of universal adoption shows a lack 
of appreciation of the difference between what may be 
expedient as a temporary measure and what is best for 
stable conditions. 



PREFACE 7 

No apology is made for the publication of an English 
version of "The Dictatorship of the Proletariat.." It is 
felt that the problems raised by the momentous happen- 
ings in Russia will not be solved unless all shades of 
Socialists are heard and impartiality and tolerance are 
observed in the discussions. 

The translation for this edition has been made by Mr. 
H. J. Stenning, to whom the Editor desires to express his 
indebtedness. 



\ 



ffi^ 



TABLE OF CONTENTS 



CHAPTER. PAGB 

I. The Problem I 

II. Democracy and the Conquest op Political 

Power 4 

III. Democracy and the Ripening of the Prole- 

tariat 12 

IV. The Effects of Democracy 25 

V. Dictatorship 42 

VI. Constituent Assembly and Soviet 59 

VII. The Soviet Republic 70 

VIII. The Object Lesson 88 

IX. The Legacy of the Dictatorship : 

(a) Agriculture 101 

(b) Industry 120 

X. The New Theory 135 



The Dictatorship of the Proletariat 



CHAPTER I. 

The Problem. 

The present Russian Revolution has, for the first 
time in the history of the world, made a Socialist 
Party the rulers of a great Empire. A far more 
powerful event than the seizing of control of the 
town of Paris by the proletariat in 1871. Yet, in 
one important aspect, the Paris Commune was 
superior to the Soviet Republic. The former was 
the work of the entire proletariat. All shades of 
the SociaHst movement took part in it, none drew 
back from it, none was excluded. 

On the other hand, the Sociahst Party which 
governs Russia to-day gained power in fighting 
against other Socialist Parties, and exercises its 
authority while excluding other Socialist Parties 
from the executive. 

The antagonism of the two Socialist movements 
is not based on small personal jealousies : it is the 
clashing of two fundamentally distinct methods, 
that of democracy and that of dictatorship. Both 



2 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETABIAT 

movements have the same end in view : to free the 
proletariat, and with it humanity, through 
SociaHsm. But the view taken by the one is held 
by the other to be erroneous and likely to lead to 
destruction. 

It is impossible to regard so gigantic an event 
as the proletarian struggle in Eussia without taking 
sides. Each of us feels impelled to violent parti- 
sanship. And the more so because the problem 
which to-day occupies our Eussian comrades will 
to-morrow assume practical significance for 
Western Europe, and does already decisiN^ely 
influence the character of our propaganda and 
tactics. 

It is, however, our party duty not to decide for 
one or the other side in the Eussian internal 
quarrel before we have thoroughly tested the argu- 
ments of both. In this many comrades would 
hinder us. They declare it to be our duty blindly 
to pronounce in favour of the section now at the 
helm. Any other attitude would endanger the 
devolution, and Socialism itself. This is nothing 
less than to ask us to accept as already proved that 
which is still to be examined, viz., that one of the 
sections has struck out in the right path, and we 
must encourage it by following. 

We place ourselves, of course, by asking for the 
fullest discussion, already on the ground of 



THE PROBLEM 3 

democracy. Dictatorship does not ask for the 
refutation of contrary views, but the forcible 
suppression of their utterance. Thus, the two 
methods of democracy and dictatorship are already 
irreconcilably opposed before the discussion has 
started. The one demands, the other forbids it. 

In the meantime, dictatorship does not yet 
reign in our Party; discussion amongst us is still 
free. And we consider it not only as our right, 
but as our duty to express our opinions freely, 
because an appropriate and fruitful decision is only 
possible after hearing all the arguments. One 
man's speech is notoriously no man's speech. Both 
sides must be listened to. 

We will, therefore, examine the significance 
which democracy has for the proletariat — what we 
understand by the dictatorship of the proletariat — 
and what conditions dictatorship, as a form of 
government, creates in the struggle for freedom of 
the proletariat. 



CHAPTER II. 

Democracy and the Conquest of Political 

Power. 

The distinction is sometimes drawn between 
democracy and Socialism, that is, the socialisation 
of the means of production and of production, by 
saying that the latter is our goal, the object of our 
movement, while democracy is merely the means to 
this end, which occasionally might become unsuit- 
able, or even a hindrance. 

To be exact, however. Socialism as such is not 
our goal, which is the abolition of every kind of 
exploitation and oppression, be it directed against 
a class, a party, a sex, or a race. 

We seek to achieve this object by supporting the 
proletarian class struggle, because the proletariat, 
being the undermost class, cannot free itself with- 
out abolishing all causes of exploitation and 
oppression, and because the industrial proletariat, 
of all the oppressed and exploited classes, is the one 
which constantly grows in strength, fighting 
capacity and inclination to carry on the struggle, 
its ultimate victory being inevitable. Therefore, 
lo-day every genuine opponent of exploitation and 



THE CONQUEST OF POLITICAL POWER 6 

oppression must take part in the class struggle, 
from whatever class he may come. 

K in this struggle we place the Sociahst way of 
production as the goal, it is because in the 
technical and economic conditions which prevail 
to-day Sociahstic production appears to be the sole 
means of attaining our object. Should it be 
proved to us that we are wrong in so doing, and 
that somehow the emancipation of the proletariat 
and of mankind could be achieved solely on the 
basis of private property, or could be most easily 
realised in the manner indicated by Proudhon, 
then we would throw Socialism overboard, with- 
out in the least giving up our object, and even in 
the interests of this object. Socialism and 
democracy are therefore not distinguished by the 
one being the means and the other the end. Both 
are means to the same end. The distinction 
between them must be sought elsewhere. Socialism 
as a means to the emancipation of the proletariat, 
without democracy, is unthinkable. 

Social production, it is true, is also possible in 
a system other than a democratic one. In 
primitive conditions communistic methods became 
the basis of despotism, as Engels noted in 1875, 
when dealing with the village communism which 
has existed in India and Russia down to our own 
day 



6 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PKOLETAEIAT 

Dutch colonial policy in Java for a long time 
based the organisation of agricultural production 
under the so-called *' culture " system upon land 
communism for the profit of the government who 
exploited the people. 

The most striking example of a non-democratic 
organisation of social work was furnished in the 
eighteenth century by the Jesuit State of Paraguay. 
There the Jesuits, as the ruling class, organised 
with dictatorial power the labour of the native 
Indian population, in a truly admirable fashion, 
without employing force, and even gaining the 
attachment of their subjects. 

For modern men, however, such a patriarchal 
regime would be intolerable. It is only possible 
under circumstances where the rulers are vastly 
superior to the ruled in knowledge, and where the 
latter are absolutely unable to raise themselves to 
an equal standard. A section or class which is 
engaged in a struggle for freedom cannot regard 
such a system of tutelage as its goal, but must 
decisively reject it. 

For us, therefore. Socialism without democracy 
is unthinkable. We understand by Modern 
Socialism not mer^ely social organisation of pro- 
duction, but democratic organisation of society as 
well. Accordingly, Socialism is for us inseparably 
connected with democracy. No Socialism without 



XJtLiii uuiNV,jUiiittT UF Ji'ULiTICAL POWEIl 7 

democracy. But this proposition is not equally 
true if reversed. Democracy is quite possible 
without Socialism. A pure democracy is even 
conceivable apart from Sociahsm, for example, m 
small peasant communities, where complete 
equality of economic conditions for everybody 
exists on the basis of participating in privately 
owned means of production. 

In any case, it may be said that democracy is 
possible without Socialism, and precedes it. It is 
this pre-Socialist democracy which is apparently in 
the minds of those who consider that democracy 
and Socialism are related to each other as the 
means to an end, although they mostly hasten to 
add that, strictly speaking, it is really no means to 
an end. This interpretation must be most 
emphatically repudiated, because, should it win 
general acceptance, it would lead our movement 
into most dangerous tracks. 

Why would democracy be an unsuitable means 
for the achievement of Socialism? 

It is a question of the conquest of political 
power. 

It is said that if in a hitherto middle-class 
democratic State the possibility exists of the Social 
Democrats becoming the majority at an election, 
the ruling classes would make use of all the forces 
at their command in order to prevent democracy 



8 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETAHIAT 

asserting itself. Therefore, it is not by democracy, 
but only by a political revolution that the prole- 
tariat can conquer the political power. 

Doubtless, in cases where the proletariat of a 
democratic State attains to power, one must reckon 
with attempts of the ruling classes to nullify by 
violence the reahsation of democracy by the 
rising class. This, however, does not prove the 
worthlessness of democracy for the proletariat. 
Should a ruling class, under the suppositions here 
discussed, resort to force, it would do so precisely 
because it feared the consequences of democracy. 
And its violence would be nothing but the 
subversion of democracv. Therefore, not the use- 
lessness of democracy for the proletariat is 
demonstrated by anticipated attempts of the ruling 
classes to destroy democracy, but rather the 
necessity for the proletariat to defend democracy 
with tooth and nail. Of course, if the proletariat is 
told that democracy is a useless ornament, the 
needful stren^th for its defence will not be 
created. The mass of the people are everj^where 
too attached to their political rights willingly to 
abandon them. On the contrarv, it is rather to be 
expected that they would defend their rights with 
such vigour that if the other side endeavoured to 
destroy the people's, privileges, a political over- 
throw would be the result. The higher the prole- 



THE CONQUEST OF POLITICAL POWER 9 

tariat values democracy, and the closer is its 
attachment to its rights, the more may one 
anticipate this course of events. 

On the other hand, it must not be thought that 
the forebodings above mentioned will everywhere 
be realised. We need not be so fainthearted. The 
more democratic the State is, the more dependent 
are the forces exerted by the Executive, even the 
military ones, on public opinion. These forces 
may become, even in a democracy, a means of 
holding down the proletarian movement, if the 
proletariat is still weak in numbers, as in an 
agrarian State, or if it is politically weak, 
because unorganised, and lacking self-conscious- 
ness. But if the proletariat in a democratic State 
grows until it is numerous and strong enough to 
conquer political power by making use of the 
liberties which exist, then it would be a task of 
great difficulty for the capitalist dictatorship to 
manipulate the force necessary for the suppression 
of democracy. 

As a matter of fact, Marx thought it possible, 
and even probable, that in England and America 
the proletariat might peacefully conquer political 
power. On the conclusion of the Congress of the 
Internationa] at the Hague in 1872. Marx spoke at 
a meeting, and among other things said : 

"The worker must one day capture political 



^0 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PBOLETARIAT 

power in order to found the new organisation of 
labour. He must reverse the old policy, which 
the old institutions maintain, if he will not, like the 
Christians of old who despised and neglected such 
things, renounce the things of this world, 

' ' But we do not assert that the way to reach this 
goal is the same everywhere. 

' ' We know that the institutions, the manners and 
the customs of the various countries must be con- 
sidered, and we do not deny that there are countries 
hke England and America, and, if I understood 
your arrangements better, I might even add 
Holland, where the worker may attain his object 
by peaceful means. But not in all countries is this 
the case.^' 

It remains to be seen whether Marx's expecta-. 
tions will be realised. 

There are certainly in the above named countries 
sections of the ruling classes whose inclinations to 
use force against the proletariat grow. But, beside 
these there are other sections in whom the rising 
power of the proletariat gains respect and evokes a 
desire to keep it in good humour by concessions. 
Although the world war, for the period of its dura- 
tion, has strictly confined the struggle of the masses 
for freedom everywhere, it has brought to the 
English proletariat a considerable extension of 
political power. It cannot to-day be foreseen how 



TilJii UUJNiqiUJbi^T OF ii'UL.lTiOAL POWER 11 

democracy in the various States will influence the 
forms which the conquest of political power by the 
proletariat will take, and how far it will avert the 
use of violent methods from both sides and promote 
the use of peaceful means. In any case, the institu- 
tion of democracy would not lose its importance. 
In a democratic republic, where the people's rights 
have been firmly established for decades, perhaps 
centuries, rights which the people conquered by 
revolution, and maintained or extended, thus com- 
pelling the respect of the ruling classes for the 
masses, in such a community the forms of transition 
would certainly be different from those in a State 
where a military despotism has been accustomed to 
rule by force, and hold the masses of the people in 
check. 

For us the significance of democracy in the pre- 
Socialist period is not exhausted with the influence 
it may have on the forms of transition to a prole- 
tarian regime. It is most important for us during 
this period, in so far as it bears on the ripening of 
the proletariat. 



CHAPTER III. 

Democracy and the Ripening of the 

Proletariat. 

Socialism postulates special historical conditions, 
which render it possible and necessary. This is 
pretty generally recognised. Yet there is by no 
means unanimity amongst us as regards the condi- 
tions which must be fulfilled in order to make 
modern Socialism possible, should a country be 
ripe for it. This divergence on such an important 
question is not a calamity, and so far as it causes us 
to be occupied with the problem at the present 
time is a matter for rejoicing. We are obliged to 
consider this matter because, for most of us, 
Socialism has ceased to be something that must be 
expected in hundreds of years, as we were assured 
by many at the time of the outbreak of war. 
Socialism has become a practical question on the 
order of the day. 

What, then, are the pre-requisites for the 
establishment of Socialism? 

Every conscious human action presupposes a 
will. The Will to Socialism is the first condition for 
its accomplishment. 

i2 



THE KIPENING OF THE PROLETARIAT 13 

This Will is created by the great industry. Where 
small production is uppermost in a society, the 
masses of the people are possessors of the means of 
production. He who happens to be without property 
conceives his ideal to be the acquirement of a small 
possession. This desire may, in some circum- 
stances, assume a revolutionary form, but such a 
social revolution would not have a Socialist 
character — it would only redistribute the existing 
wealth in such a manner that everyone would 
receive a share. Small production always creates 
the Will to uphold or to obtain private property in 
the means of production which are in vogue, not 
the will to social property, to Socialism. This 
Will first appears amongst the masses when large 
scale industry is already much developed, and its 
superiority over small production is unquestioned ; 
when it w^ould be a retrograde step, if it were pos- 
sible, to break up large scale industry when the 
workers engaged in the large industry cannot 
obtain a share in the means of production unless 
they take on a social form; when small production, 
so far as it exists, steadily deteriorates, so that the 
small producers can no longer support themselves 
thereby. In this way the Will to SociaUsm grows. 

At the same time, the material possibilities of its 
achievement increase with the growth of the large 
industry. The larger the number of producers, and 



14 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETAHIAT 

the more independent of each other they are, the 
more difficult it is to organise them socially. This 
difficulty disappears in the measure in which the 
number of producers decreases, and the relations 
between them become more close and uniform. 
Finally, alongside of the will to Socialism, and its 
material conditions — the raw material of Socialism 
— the strength to realise it must also exist. Those 
who want Socialism must become stronger than 
those who do not want it. 

This factor, too, is created by the development 
of the large industry, which causes an increase in 
the number of proletarians — those who have an 
interest in Socialism — and a decrease in the number 
of capitalists, that is a decrease as compared with 
the number of proletarians. In comparison with 
the non-proletarian classes, the small peasants and 
lower middle classes, the number of capitalists may 
increase for some time. But the proletariat 
increases more rapidly than any other class in the 
State. 

These factors are the direct outcome of the 
economic development. They do not arise of 
themselves, without human co-operation, but they 
arise without proletarian co-operation, solely 
through the operations of the capitalists, who have 
an interest in the growth of their large industry. 
This development is in the first place industrial, and 



THE RIPENING OF THE PEOLETAEIAT 15 

confined to the towns. The agrarian development 
is only a weak echo of it. Socialism will come from 
the k)wns and from industry, but not from agri- 
cultiire. For its realisation yet another — a fourth — 
factor is needful besides those already mentioned. 
The proletariat must not only have an interest in the 
establishment of Socialism, it must not merelv have 
the material conditions for Socialism readv to 
hand, and possess the strength to make use of them ; 
it must also have the capacity to retain its hold of 
them, and properly to employ them. Only then 
can Socialism be realised as a permanent method of 
production. 

To the ripening of the conditions, the necessary 
level of the industrial development, must be added 
the maturity of the proletariat, in order to make 
Socialism possible. This factor will not, however, 
be created by the efforts of the capitalist to obtain 
rent, interest and profit, without the co-operation 
of the proletariat. It must, on the contrary, be 
obtained by the exertions of the proletariat in 
opposition to the capitalist. 

Under the system of small production those 
without property fall into two sections. For one 
of them, viz., apprentices and peasants' sons, their 
lack of property is only a temporary condition. 
The members of this class expect one day 
to become possessors and have an interest 



16 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

in private property. The other section of 
the class without property are the vagabonds, 
who are unnecessary and even harmful parasites on 
society, without education, without self -conscious- 
ness, without cohesion. When a chance oflEers 
itself, they are quite ready to expropriate the 
possessors, but they neither want nor are able to 
construct a new social order. 

The capitalist method of production makes use 
of this propertyless class of vagabonds, whose 
numbers assume large proportions in the beginning 
of the capitalist system. Out of superfluous, even 
dangerous parasites, they are transformed into the 
indispensable economic foundations of production, 
and therefore of society. CapitaHsm increases 
their numbers and multiplies their strength, but it 
exploits their ignorance, rawness and incapacity. 
It even seeks to depress the working classes to their 
level. By overwork, monotony and dulness of 
toil, labour of women and children, capitalism even 
presses the working classes below the level of the 
former vagabond class. The impoverishment of 
the proletariat increases in an alarming degree. 

From it, however, the first striving towards 
Socialism appears as an effort to make an end of the 
growing poverty of the masses. It seemed, how- 
ever, that this poverty must render the proletariat 
for ever incapable of emancipating itself. Middle- 



THE RIPENING OF THE PROLETARIAT 17 

class sympathy must save it, and bring Socialism 
about. 

It is soon apparent that nothing can be expected 
from this sympathy. Sufficient strength to 
accomplish Socialism can only be expected from 
those whose interests lie that way, that is the 
proletarians. But were not they perishing without 
hope? 

Not all, in fact. There were particular sections 
which had shown strength and courage to fight 
against poverty. This small fraction would do what 
the Utopians were not capable of doing. 

By a sudden stroke it would capture the powers 
of the State, and bring Socialism to the people. 
This was the conception of Blanqui and Weitling. 
The proletariat, which was too ignorant and 
demoralised to organise and rule itself, should be 
organised and ruled by a government comprised of 
its educated elite, something like the Jesuits in 
Paraguay who had organised and governed the 
Indians. 

Weithng foresaw the dictatorship of a single 
person, who would carry through Socialism at the 
head of a victorious revolutionary armj. He 
called him a Messiah. 

*' I see a new Messiah coming with the sword, to 
carry into effect the teachings of the first. By his 
courage he will be placed at the head of the revolu- 



18 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETARIAT 

tionary army, and with its help he will crumble the 
decayed structure of the old social order, and drown 
the sources of tears in the ocean of forgetfulness, 
and transform the earth into a paradise." — 
(Guarantees of Harmony and Freedom.) 

A generous and enthusiastic anticipation. It is 
based, however, solely upon the expectation that 
the revolutionary army will find the right man. But 
suppose one is not disposed to accept this belief in 
a coming Messiah, and holds the conviction that 
unless the proletariat can free itself Socialism must 
remain an Utopia? 

In view of the fact that the proletariat has not 
attained to the capacity for self-government in any 
of the organisations with which it is concerned, is 
not the hopelessness of Socialism, in face of the 
impoverishment of the workers by capitalism, 
thereby demonstrated? 

So it would appear. Yet practice and theory 
soon showed a way out. In England the industrial 
proletariat first became a mass movement, there it 
found some instalment of democratic rights, some 
possibilities of organisation and of propaganda, and 
was stirred into motion by being summoned to the 
aid of the middle class in the struggle with the 
nobles for the franchise. 

Among the Trade Unions and the Chartists the 
beginnings of the Labour movement first arose, with 



THE KIPENING OF THE PKOLETAEIAT 19 

the resistance offered by the proletariat to its 
impoverishment and disfranchisement. It com- 
menced its strikes, and its great fight for the 
suffrage and the normal working day. 

Marx and Engels early recognised the signifi- 
cance of this movement. It was not the '* theory 
of impoverishment ' ' which characterised Marx and 
Engels. They held this in common with other 
Socialists, but were superior to them by not only 
recognising the capitalist tendency towards 
impoverishment, but also the proletarian counter 
tendency, and in this, in the class struggle, they 
recognised the great factor which would uplift the 
proletariat, and give it the capacity which it needs 
if it is not merely to grasp political power by the 
luck of an accident, but is to be in a position to 
make itself master of that power, and to use it. 

The proletarian class struggle, as a struggle of 
the masses, presupposes democracy. If not 
absolute and pure democracy, yet so much of 
democracy as is necessary to organise masses, and 
give them uniform enlightenment. This cannot be 
adequately done by secret methods. A few fly 
sheets cannot be a substitute for an extensive daily 
Press. Masses cannot be organised secretly, and, 
above all, a secret organisation cannot be a 
democratic one. It always leads to the dictatorship 
of a single man, or of a small knot of leaders. The 



20 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PBOLETARIAT 

ordinary members can only become instruments fori 
carrying out orders. Such a method may be 
rendered necessary for an oppressed class m the 
absence of democracy, but it would not promote the 
self-government and independence of the masses. 
Rather would it further the Messiah-consciousness 
of leaders, and their dictatorial habits. 

The same Weitling, who gave such prominence to 
the function of a Messiah, spoke most contemp- 
tuously of democracy. 

'' Communists are still pretty undecided about 
the choice of their form of government. A large 
part of those in France incline to a dictatorship, 
because they well know that the sovereignty of the 
people, as understood by republicans and politi- 
cians, is not suited for the period of transition from 
the old to a completely new organisation. Owen, 
the chief of the English Communists, would have 
the performance of specified duties allotted to men 
according to age, and the chief leaders of a govern- 
ment would be the oldest members of it. All 
Socialists with the exception of the followers of 
Fourier, to whom all forms of government are the 
same, are agreed that the form of government which 
is called the sovereignty of the people is a very 
unsuitable, and even dangerous, sheet anchor for 
the young principle of Communism about to be ^^^ 
realised." 



/ " 



THE EIPENING OF THE PEOLETARIAT 21 

Weitling goes further. He will have nothing of 
democracy, even in a Socialist community. 

** If the idea of the sovereignty of the people is to 
be applied, all must rule. This can never be the 
case, and it is, therefore, not the sovereignty of 
the people, but the chance sovereignty of some of 
the people." 

Weitling wanted the greatest geniuses to govern. 
They would be selected in a competition by 
scientific assemblies. 

I have quoted Weitling in detail in order to show 
that the contempt for democracy, which is now 
recommended to us as the highest wisdom, is quite 
an old conception, and corresponds to a primitive 
stage in the working-class movement. At the same 
time that Weitling poured scorn on Universal 
SuJGFrage and freedom of the Press, the workers of 
England were fighting for these rights, and Marx 
and Engels ranged themselves by their side. 

Since then the working classes of the whole of 
Europe, in numerous — often bloody — struggles, 
have conquered one instalment of democracy after 
the other, and by their endeavours to win, maintain 
and extend democracy, and by constantly making 
use of each instalment for organisation, for pro- 
paganda, and for wresting social reforms, have 
they grown in maturity from year to year, and from 



22 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETAEIAT 

the lowest have become the highest placed section 
of the masses of the people. 

Has the proletariat already attained the maturity 
which Socialism postulates? And are the other 
conditions now in existence ? These questions are 
to-day much disputed, the answers given being by 
some as decisively in the affirmative as by others in 
the negative. Both answers seem to me rather 
over hasty. Eipeness for Socialism is not a condi- 
tion which lends itself to statistical calculation 
before the proof can be put to the test. In any 
case, it is wrong, as so often happens in discussing 
this question, to put the material pre-requisites of 
Socialism too much in the foreground. No doubt, 
without a certain development of the large industry 
no Socialism is possible, but when it is asserted that 
Socialism would only become practicable when 
capitalism is no more in a position to expand, all. 
proof of this is lacking. It is correct to say that 
Socialism would be the more easily realisable the 
more developed the large industry is, and therefore 
the more compact the productive forces are v/hich 
must be socially organised. 

Yet this is only relevant to the problem, when it 
is considered from the standpoint of a particular 
State. The simplification of the problem in this 
form is, however, counteracted bv the fact that the 
growth of the large industry is accompanied by an 



THETlIFEN]3rcrDFTHETTU)LETAKIAT 23 

expansion of its markets, the progress of the 
division of labour and of international communica- 
tions, and therewith the constant widening and 
increasing complication of the problem of the 
social organisation of production. There is, indeed, 
no reason for believing that the organisation of the 
largest part of production for social ends, by the 
State, Municipalities, and Co-operative Societies, is 
not already possible in modern industrial States, 
with their banking facilities and their machinery for 
the conduct of businesses. 

The decisive factor is no longer the material, but 
the personal one. Is the proletariat strong and 
intelligent enough to take in hand the regulation of 
society, that is, does it possess the power and the 
capacity to transfer democracy from politics to 
economics? This cannot be foretold with cer- 
tainty. The factor in question is one which is in 
different stages of development in different coun- 
tries, and it fluctuates considerably at various times 
in the same country. Adequate strength and 
capacity are relative conceptions. The same 
measure of strength may be insufficient to-day, 
when the opponents are strong, but to-morrow 
quite adequate, when they have suffered a moral, 
economic or military collapse. 

The same measure of capacity might be quite 
inadequate to-day should power be attained m a 



24 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PEOLETARIAT 

highly compHcated situation, and yet to-morrow it 
could be equal to all demands made on it, if mean- 
while conditions have simplified and become 
stabler. 

In every case only practice can show i£ the 
proletariat is already sufficiently mature for 
Socialism. We can only say the following for 
certain. The proletariat grows always in numbers, 
strength and intelligence, it is ever approaching the 
climax of its development. 

It is not definite enough to say that the latter 
phase will be reached when the proletariat forms the 
majority of the people, and when the majority 
announce their adhesion to Socialism. On the 
other hand, it may be confidently said that a people 
is not yet ripe for Socialism so long as the majority 
of the masses are hostile to Socialism, and will have 
nothing of it. 

So here again democracy not only matures the 
proletariat the soonest, but gives the quickest 
indications of this process. 



CHAPTEE IV. 

The Effects of Democracy. 

The modern State is a rigidly centralised organism, 
an organisation comprising the greatest power 
within modern society, and influencing in the most 
effective way the fate of each individual, as is 
especially obvious in time of war. 

The State is to-day what the family and com- 
munity used to be for the individual. If com- 
munities were in their way democratically 
organised, the power of the State, on the contrary, 
including the bureaucracy and the army, looms over 
the people, even gaining such strength that at times 
it acquires an ascendancy over the classes which 
are socially and economically dominant, thus con- 
stituting itself an absolute government. Yet this 
latter condition is nowhere lasting. The absolute 
rule of bureaucracy leads to its ossification and its 
absorption into endless time-wasting formulae, and 
that just at the time when industrial capitalism is 
developing, when the revolutionary methods of 
production which arise from it subject all economic 
and social conditions to constant change, and 

25 



26 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETARIAT 

impart a quicker movement to industrial life, thus 
requiring the speediest pohtical adjustments. 

The absolute rule of bureaucracy, therefore; 
leads to arbitrariness and stultification, but a system 
of production like capitalism, in which each pro- 
ducer is dependent upon numerous others nee3s 
for its prosperity the security and legality of social 
relations. The absolute State gets into conflict with 
the productive forces, and becomes a fetter on 
them. It is, then, urgently necessary for the 
executive to be subjected to public criticism, for 
free organisations of citizens to counterbalance the 
power of the State, for self-government in munici- 
palities and provinces to be established, for the 
power of law-making to be taken from the 
bureaucracy, and put under the control of a central 
assembly, freely chosen by the people, that is a 
Parliament. The control of the Government is the 
most important duty of Parliament, and in this it 
can be replaced by no other institution. It is con- 
ceivable, though hardly practicable, for the law- 
making power to be taken from the bureaucracy, 
and entrusted to various committees of experts, 
which would draft the laws and submit them to the 
people for their decision. The activities of the 
executive can only be supervised by another cen- 
tral body, and not by an unorganised and formless 
mass of people. 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCRACY 27 

'J'he attempts to overcome the absolute power of 
the State, as here described, are made by all classes 
in a modern State, with the exception of those 
which may share in its power, that is all except 
bureaucrats, court nobles, the State Church, as well 
as the great bankers who do a lucrative business 
with the State. 

Before the united pressure of the other classes, 
which may include the landed gentry, the lower 
clergy, the industrial capitalists, the absolute 
regime must give way. In a greater or lesser 
degree it must concede freedom of the Press, of 
public meeting, of organisation, and a Parliament. 
All the States of Europe have successfully passed 
through this development. 

Every class will, however, endeavour to shape 
the new form of the State in a manner correspond- 
ing to its particular interests. This attempt is 
especially manifested in the struggle over the 
character of the Parliament, that is in the fight for 
the franchise. The watchword of the lower classes, 
of the people, is Universal Suffrage. Not only the 
wage-earner, but the small peasant and the lower 
middle classes have an interest in the franchise. 

Everywhere and under all circumstances these 
classes form the great majority of the population. 
Whether the proletariat is the predominant class 
amongst these depends on the extent of the 



28 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PKOLETARIAT 

economic development, although this factor does 
not determine whether the proletariat comprises the 
majority of the population. The exploiters are 
always a small minority of the population. 

In the long run no modern State can withstand 
the pressure of these classes, and anything short of 
general suffrage in our society to-day would be an 
absurdity. In capitalist society, with its con- 
stantly changing conditions, the classes cannot be 
stereotyped in fixed grooves. All social conditions 
are in a state of flux. A franchise based on status 
is consequently excluded. A class which is not 
organised as such is a formless fluctuating mass, 
whose exact boundaries it is quite impossible to 
mark. A class is an economic entity, not a legal 
one. Class-membership is always changing. Many 
handworkers who, under the regime of small 
industry, think they are possessors, feel like prole- 
tarians under large industry, and are really prole- 
tarians even when for purposes of statistics they are 
included with the possessing classes and inde- 
pendent producers. There is also no franchise 
based on the census which would secure to the 
possessing classes a lasting monopoly of Parliament. 
It would be upset by every depreciation in money 
values. Finally, a franchise based on education 
would be even more futile, in view of the progress 
of culture amongst the masses. Thus various 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCRACY 29 

factors combine to render general suffrage the only 
solution in tihe society of to-day, and bring the 
question more and more to the front. Above all, 
it is the only rational solution from the standpomt 
of the proletariat as the lowest class of the popula- 
tion. The most effective weapon of the proletariat 
is its numerical strength. It cannot emancipate 
itself until it has become the largest class of the 
population, and until capitahst society is so far 
developed that the small peasants and the lower 
middle classes no longer overweight the prole- 
tariat. 

The proletariat has also an interest in the fact 
that the suffrage should not only be universal and 
equal, but also non-discriminatory, so that men and 
women, or wage earners and capitalists, do not vote 
in separate sections. Such a method would not 
only involve the danger that particular sections, who 
belong to the proletariat in reality, but are not wage 
earners in form, would be separated from it, but 
it would also have the still worse result of narrowing 
the outlook of the proletariat. For its great 
historical mission consists in the fact that the 
collective interests of society fall into line with its 
permanent class interests, which are not always the 
t^ame thing as special sectional interests. It is a 
symptom of the maturity of the proletariat when its 
olass consciousness is raised to the highest point by 



30 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

its grasp of large social relations and ends. This 
understanding is only made completely clear by 
scientific Socialism, not only by theoretical teach- 
ingj but by the habit of regarding things as a whole 
instead of looking at special interests which are 
furthered and extended by engaging in pohtical 
action. Confining the outlook to trade interests 
narrows the mind, and this is one of the draw- 
backs to mere Trade Unionism. Herein lies the 
superiority of the organisation of the Social 
Democratic Party, and also the superiority of a 
nondiscriminatory, as compared with a franchise 
which divides the electors into categories. 

In the struggle for the political rights referred to 
modern democracy arises, and the proletariat, 
matures. At the same time a new factor appears, 
viz., the protection of minorities, the opposition in 
the State. Democracy signifies rule of majority, but 
not less the protection of minorities. 

The absolute rule of bureaucracy strives to obtain ] 
for itself permanency. The forcible suppression of 
all opposition is its guiding principle. Almost 
everywhere it must do this to prevent its power 
being forcibly broken. It is otherwise with 
democracy, which means the rule of majorities. 
But majorities change. In a democracy no regime 
can be adapted to long duration. 

Even the relative strength of classes is not a fixed 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCKAGY 31 

quantity, at least in the capitalist era. But the 
strength of parties changes even quicker than the 
strength of classes, and it is parties which aspire to 
power in a democracy. 

It must not here be forgotten, what so often 
happens, that the abstract simplification of theory, 
although necessary to a clear understanding of 
realities is only true in the last resort, and between 
it and actualities there are many intervening 
factors. A class can rule, but not govern, for a 
class is a formless mass, while only an organisation 
can govern. It is the poHtical parties which govern 
in a democracy. A party is, however, not 
synonymous with a class, although it may, in the 
first place, represent a class interest. One and the 
same class interest can be represented in very 
different ways, by various tactical methods. 
According to their variety, the representatives of 
the same class interests are divided into different 
parties. Above all, the deciding factor is the 
position in relation to other classes and parties. 
Only seldom does a class dispose of so much power 
that it can govern the State by itself. If a class 
attains power, and finds that it cannot keep it by its 
own strength, it seeks for allies. If such allies are 
forthcoming, various opinions and standpoints 
prevail amongst the representatives of the dominant 
class interests. 



32 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

In this way, during the eighteenth century Whigs 
and Tories represented the same landed interest, 
but one party endeavoured to further it by 
aUiance with the middle classes of the towns at the 
expense of the Throne and its resources, while the 
other party conceived the Monarchy to be its 
strongest support. Similarly to-day in England and 
also elsewhere, Liberals and Conservatives repre- 
sent the same capitalist interests. But the one 
thinks they will be best served by an alliance with 
the landed class, and forcible suppression of the 
working classes, while the other fears dire conse- 
quences from this policy, and strives to conciliate 
the working classes by small concessions at the 
expense of the landed class. 

As with the socially and economically ruling 
classes and their parties, so it is with the aspiring 
class and its parties. 

Parties and classes are therefore not necessarily 
coterminous. A class can split up into various 
parties, and a party may consist of members of 
various classes. A class mav still remain the 
rulers, while changes occur in the governing party, 
if the majority of the ruling class considers the 
methods of the existing governing party unsuitable, 
and that of its opponents to be more appropriate. 

Government by parties in a democracy changes 
more rapidly than the rule of classes. Under these 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCKACY 33 

circumstances, no party is certain of retaining 
power, and must always count on the possibility of 
being in the minority, but by virtue of the nature of 
the Siiiie no party need remain in a minority for 
ever. 

These conditions account for the gi'owing practice 
of protecting minorities in a democracy. The 
deeper the roots which a democracy has struck, and 
the longer it has lasted and influenced political 
customs, the more effective is the minoritv, and the 
more successfully it can oppose the pretensions of 
any party which seeks to remain in power at all 
costs. 

What significance the protection of minorities has 
for the early stages of the SociaJist Party, which 
everywhere started as a sm^all minority, and how 
much it has helped the proletariat to mature, is 
clear. In the ranks of the Socialist Party the pro- 
tection of minorities is very important. Every new 
doctrine, be it of a theoretical or a tactical nature, 
is represented in the first place by minorities. If 
these are forcibly suppressed, instead of being dis- 
cussed, the majority is spared much trouble an(!^ 
inconvenience. Much unnecessary labour might 
be saved — a doctrine does not mean pro- 
gress because it is new and championed by a 
minority. Most of what arises as new thought has 



34 DICTATOBSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

already been discussed long before, and recognised 
as untenable » either by practice or by refutation. 

Ignorance is always bringing out old wares as if 
they were something new. Other new ideas may 
be original, but put in a perverted shape. Although 
only a few of the new ideas and doctrines may spell 
real progress, yet progress is only possible through 
new ideas, which at the outset are put forward by 
minorities. The suppression of the new ideas of 
minorities in the Party would only cause harm to 
Ae proletarian class struggle, and an obstacle to 
the development of the proletariat. The world is 
always bringing us against new problems, which 
are not to be solved by the existing methods. 

Tedious as it may be to sift the wheat from the 
chaff, this is an unavoidable task if our movement 
is not to stagnate, and is to rise to the height of the 
tasks before it. And what is needful for a party is 
also needful for the State. Protection of minorities 
is an indispensable condition for democratic 
development, and no less important than the rule o1 
the majority. 

Another characteristic of democracy is here 
brought in view, which is the form it gives to the 
class struggle. 

In 1893 and in 1900 1 have already discussed this 
matter, and give below some quotations from my 
writings : 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCKACY 35 

** Freedom of combination and of the Press and 
universal suffrage (under circumstances, even con- 
scription) are not only weapons which are secured 
to the proletariat in the modern State by the revo- 
lutionary struggle of the middle class, but these 
institutions throw on the relative strength of parties 
and classes, and on the mental energy which 
vitahses them a light which is absent in the time of 
Absolutism. At that time the ruling, as well as 
the revolutionary, classes were fighting in the dark. 
As every expression of opposition was rendered 
impossible, neither the Government nor the Revo- 
lutionists were aware of their strength. Each of 
the two sides was thus exposed to the danger of 
over-estimating its strength, so long as it refrained 
from measuring itself in a struggle with the 
opponent, and of under-estimating its strength the 
moment it suffered a single defeat, and then ^hrew 
its arms away. 

** This is really one of the chief reasons why, in 
the revolutionary period of the middle class, so 
many institutions collapsed at one blow, and so- 
many governments were overthrown at a smgle 
stroke, and it also explains all the vicissitudes of 
revolution and counter-revolution. 

** It is quite different to-day, at least in countries 
which possess some measure of democratic govern- 
ment. These democratic institutions have been 



36 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

called the safety valve of society. It is quite f-ulse 
to say that the proletariat in a democracy ceases to 
be revolutionary, that it is contented with giving 
public expression to its indignation and its suffer- 
ings, and renounces the idea of social and political 
revolution. Democracy cannot remove the class 
antagonisms of capitalist society, nor prevent the 
overthrow of that societv, which is their inevitable 
outcome. But if it cannot prevent the Eevolution, 
it can avoid many reckless and premature attempts 
at revolution, and render many revolutdonary 
movements unnecessary. It gives a clear indica- 
tion of the relative strength of classes and parties ; 
it does not do away with their antagonism, nor 
does it avoid the ultimate outcome of their struggle, 
but it serves to prevent the rising classes from 
attempting tasks to which they are not equal, and it 
also restrains the ruling classes from refusing con- 
cessions when they no longer have the strength to 
maintain such refusal. The direction of evolution 
is not thereby altered, but the pace is made more 
even and steady. The coming to the front of the 
proletariat in a State wath some measure of 
democratic government will not be marked by such 
a striking victory as attended the middle classes in 
their revolutionary period, nor will it be exposed 
to a violent overthrow. 

** Since the rise of the modern Social Demociatic 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCKACY 37 

working-class movement in the sixties, the 
European proletariat has only suffered one great- 
defeat, in the Paris Commune of 1871. At xhe 
time France was still suffering from the conse- 
quences of the Empire, whi(;h had withheld real 
democratic institutions from the people, the 
French proletariat had only attained to the slightest 
degree of class-consciousness, and the revolt was 
provoked. 

The proletarian-democratic method of conduct- 
ing the struggle may seem to be a slower affair 
than the revolutionary period of the middle class ; 
it is certainly less dramatic and striking, but it also 
exacts a smaller measure of sacrifice. This may 
be quite indifferent to the finely endowed literary 
people who find in Socialism an interesting 
pastime, but not to those who really carry on the 
fight. 

*'This so-called peaceful method of the class 
struggle, which is confined to non-militant methods, 
Parliamentarism, strikes, demonstrations, the 
Press, and similar means of pressure, will retain 
its importance in every country according to the 
effectiveness of the democratic institutions which 
prevail there, the degree of political and economic 
enlightenment, and the self-mastery of the people. 

''On these grounds, I anticipate that the social 
revolution of the proletariat will assume quite 



38 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETABIAT 

other forms than that of the middle class, and that 
it will be possible to carry it out by peaceful j 
economic, legal and moral means, instead of by 
physical force, in all places where democracy has 
been established." 

The above is my opinion to-day. 

Of course, every institution has its bad side, and 
disadvantages can be discovered in democracy. 

Where the proletariat is without rights, it can 
develop no mass organisation, and normally 
cannot promote mass action; there it is only 
possible for a handful of reckless fighters to offer 
lasting opposition to the governing regime. But 
this elite is daily confronted with the necessity of 
bringing the entire system to an end. Undis- 
tracted by the small demands of daily politics, the 
mind is concentrated on the largest problems, and 
learns constantly to keep in view the entire 
political and social relations. 

Only a small section of the proletariat takes 
part in the fight, but it cherishes keen theoretical 
interest, and is inspired by the great aims. 

Quite differently does democracy affect the 
proletariat, when it has only a few hours a day at 
its disposal under present-day conditions. Demo- 
cracy develops mass organisations involving 
immense administrative work; it calls on the 
citizen to discuss and solve numerous questions of 



THE EFFECTS OF DEMOCRACY 39 

the day, often of the most trivial kind. The whole 
of the free time of the proletariat is more and more 
taken up with petty details, and its attention 
occupied by passing events. The mind is con- 
tracted within a narrow circle. Ignorance and 
even contempt of theory, opportunism in place of 
broad principles, tend to get the upper hand. 
Marx and Engels praised the theoretical mind of 
the German working class, in contrast with the 
workers of Western Europe and America. They 
would to-day find the same theoretical interest 
amongst the Russian workers, in comparison with 
the Germans. 

Nevertheless, everywhere the class-conscious 
proletariat and their representatives fight for the 
realisation of democracy, and many of them have 
shed their life's blood for it. 

They know that without democracy nothing can 
be done. The stimulating results of the struggle 
with a despotism are confined to a handful, and do 
not touch the masses. On the other hand, the 
degenerating influence of democracy on the prole- 
tariat need not be exaggerated. Often is it the 
consequence of the lack of leisure from which the 
proletariat suffers, not of democracy itself. 

It were indeed extraordinary if the possession of 
freedom necessarily made men more narrow and 
trivial than its absence. The more democracy 



40 DICTATORSHIjf UJ^' T-tLJii I'KOL.ETARIAT 

tends to shorten the working day, the greater the 
sum of leisure at the disposal of the proletariat, 
the more it is enabled to combine devotion to large 
problems with attention to necessary detail. And 
the impulse thereto is not lacking. For whatever 
democracy may be able to accomplish it cannot 
resolve the antagonisms inherent in a capitalist 
system of production, so long as it refrains from 
alteiing this system. On the contrary, the 
antagonisms in capitalist society become more 
acute and tend to provoke bigger conflicts, in this 
way forcing great problems on the attention of the 
proletariat, and taking its mind off routine and 
detail work. 

Under democracy this moral elevation is no 
longer confined to a handful, but is shared in by 
the whole of the people, who are at the same time 
gradually accustomed to self-government by the 
daily performance of routine work. 

Again, under democracy, the proletariat does 
not always think and talk of revolution, as under 
despotism. It may for years, and even decades, be 
immei^ed in detail work, but everwhere situations 
must arise which will kindle in it revolutionary 
thought and aspirations. 

When the people are roused to action under a 
democracy, there is less danger than under 
despotism that they have been prematurely pro- 



T±ii^ j^:je'±JBXJTSUF"DEMOCEACY 41 

voked, or will waste their energy in futile efforts. 
When victory is achieved, it will not be lost, but 
successfully maintained. And that is better in the 
end than the mere nervous excitement of a fresh 
revolutionary drama. 



CHAPTER V. 

Dictatorship. 

Democracy is the essential basis for building up a 
Socialist system of production. Only under the 
influence of democracy does the proletariat attain 
that maturity which it needs to be able to brmg 
^bout Socialism, and democracy supplies the surest 
means for testing its maturity. Between these two 
stages, the preparation for Socialism and its 
realisation, which both require democracy, there is 
the transition state when the proletariat has con- 
quered political power, but has not yet brought 
about Socialism in an economic sense. In this 
intervening period it is said that democracy is not 
only unnecessary, but harmful. 

This idea is not new. We have already seen it 
to be WeitHng's. But it is supposed to be sup- 
ported by Karl Marx. In his letter criticising the 
'Gotha party programme, written in May, 1875, it 
is stated: *' Between capitalist and communist 
society lies the period of the revolutionary trans- 
formation of the one into the other. This requires 
:a political transition stage, which can be nothing 

42 



DICTATORSHIP 43 

else than the revolutionary dictatorship of the 
proletariat." 

Marx had unfortunately omitted to specify more 
exactly what he conceived this dictatorship to be. 
Taken literally, the word signifies the suspension 
of democracy. But taken literally it also means 
the sovereignty of a single person, who is bound by 
no laws. A sovereignty which is distinguished 
from a despotism by being regarded as a passing 
phase, required by th^ circumstances of the 
moment, and not a permanent institution of the 
State. 

The expression * * Dictatorship of the Prole- 
tariat/' that is the dictatorship not of a single 
person, but of a class, excludes the inference that 
Marx thought of dictatorship in the literal sense. 

He speaks in the passage above quoted not of a 
form of government, but of a condition which must 
everywhere arise when the proletariat has con- 
quered political power. That he was not thinking 
of a form of government is shown by his opinion 
that in England and America the transition might 
be carried out peacefully. Of course, Democracy 
does not guarantee a peaceful transition. But 
this is certainly not possible without Democracy. 

However, to find out what Marx thought about 
the dictatorship of the proletariat, we need not 
have recourse to speculation. If in 1875 Marx 



44 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PEOLETAEIAT 

did not explain in detail what he understood by the. 
dictatorship of the proletariat, it might well 
have been because he had expressed himself on this 
matter a few years before, in his study of the Civil 
War in France. In that work, he wrote : *' The 
Commune was essentially a government of the 
working class, the result of the struggle of the 
producing class against the appropriating class, the 
political form under which the freedom of labour 
could be attained bein.^ at length revealed." 

Thus the Paris Commune was, as Engels 
expressly declared in his introduction to the third 
edition of Marx's book, *' The Dictatorship of the 
Proletariat." 

It was, however, at the same time not the 
suspension of democracy, but was founded on its 
most thoroughgoing use, on the basis of universal 
suffrage. The power of the Government was sub- 
jected to universal suffrage. 

'* The Commune was composed of town coun- 
cillors, chosen by general suffrage in the various 
departments of Paris. 

' * Universal suffrage was to serve the people, 
constituted in Communes, as individual suffrage 
serves every other employer in the search for the 
workmen and managers in his business." 

Marx constantly speaks here of the general 
suffrage of the whole people, and not of the votes 



DICTATOHSHIP 45 

of a specially privileged class. The dictatorship 
of the proletariat was for him a condition which 
necessarily arose in a real democracy, because of 
the overwhelming numbers of the proletariat. 

Marx must not, therefore, be cited by those who 
support diciatorship in preference to democracy. 
Of course, this does not prove it to be wrong. 
Onlv, it must be demonstrated on other grounds. 

In the examination of this question, dictatorship 
as a condition must not be confused with dictator- 
ship as a form of government, which alone is 
a subject of dispute in our ranks. Dictatorship as 
a form of government means disarming the opposi- 
tion, by taking from them the franchise, and 
liberty of the Press and combination. The question 
is whether the victorious proletariat needs to 
employ these measures, and wliether Socialism is 
only or most easily reahsable with their aid. 

It must next be noted that when we speak of 
dictatorship as a form of government, we cannot 
mean the dictatorship of a class. For, as already 
remarked, a class can only rule, not govern. If by 
dictatorship we do not merely signify a state of 
sovereignty, but a form of government, then 
dictatorship comes to mean that of a single person, 
or of an organisation, not of the proletariat, but of 
a proletarian party. The problem is then com- 
plicated so soon as the proletariat itself is divided 



46 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

into various parties. The dictatorship of one of 
these parties is then no longer in any sense the 
dictatorship of the proletariat, but a dictatorship 
of one part of the proletariat over the other. The 
situation becomes still more complicated if the 
Socialist Parties are divided according to their 
relations to non-proletarian elements, and if per- 
• hance one party attains to power by an alliance of 
town proletarians and peasants, then the dictator- 
ship becomes not merely a dictatorship of pro- 
letarians over proletarians, but of proletarians and 
peasants over proletarians. The dictatorship of 
the proletariat thus assumes a very peculiar form. 

What are the grounds for thinking that the 
sovereignty of the proletariat must necessarily 
take a form which is incompatible with democracy? 

Now it may be taken for granted that as a rule 
the proletariat will only attain to power when it 
represents the majority of the population, or, at 
least, has the latter behind it. Next to its economic 
indispensability, the weapon of the proletariat in 
its poHtical struggles is its huge numbers. It may 
only expect to carry the day against the resources 
of the ruling classes where it has the masses behind 
it. This was the opinion of Marx and Engels, and 
therefore they wrote in the Communist Manifesto : 

All previous movements were movements of 
minorities, and in the interests of minorities. The 



UiUXAXUltaiili:' d7 

proletarian movement is the independent move- 
ment of the immense majority, in the interest of 
that majority.'' 

This was true also of the Paris Commune. The 
first act of the new revolutionary regime was an 
appeal to the electors. The ballot, taken under 
conditions of the greatest freedom, gave strong 
majorities for the Commune in all districts of 
Paris. Sixty-five revolutionaries were chosen, 
against 21 of the Opposition, of whom 15 were 
distinct reactionaries, and six Radical Republicans 
of the Gambetta school. Among the 65 revolu- 
tionaries all the existing phases of French 
Socialism were represented. However much they 
fought against each other, no one exercised a 
dictatorship over the others. 

A government so strongly supported by the 
masses has not the least occasion to interfere with 
democracy. It cannot dispense with the n^e of 
force when this is employed to suppress demo- 
cracy. Force can only be met by force. But a 
government which knows that the masses are 
behind it would only use force to protect demo- 
cracy, and not to subvert it. It would be com- 
mitting suicide to cast aside such a strong support 
as universal suffrage, which is a powerful source 
of moral authority. 

The subversion of democracy by dictatorship 



48 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PEOLETAKIAT 

can therefore only be a matter for consideration in 
exceptional cases, when an extraordinary com- 
bination of favourable circumstances enables a 
proletarian party to take to itself political power, 
while the majority of tJie people are either Jiot on 
its side, or are even against it. 

Amongst a people who have been trained in 
pohtics for decades, and have run into party 
moulds, such a chance victory is hardly possible. 
It is only likely in very backward conditions. If 
in such a case universal suffrage goes against the 
Socialist Government, is the latter now to do what 
we have hitherto demanded of every government, 
viz., to bow to the will of the people, and to 
resume its struggle for the powei- of the State with 
confidence, on the basis of democracy, or is it to 
subvert democracy in order to hold on to power? 

How can a dictatorship remain at the helm 
against the will of the majority of the people? 

Two ways suggest themselves, that of Jesuitism 
or that of Bonapartism. 

We have already referred to the Jesuit State m 
Paraguay. The means by which the Jesuits there 
maintained their autJiority was their enormous 
mental superiority to the natives organised by 
them, who without them were helpless. 

Can a Socialis-t Party acquire such a superiority 
in a European State? This is quite out of the 



DICTATOKSHIP 49 

question. No doubt the proletariat, in the course 
of the class struggle, raises its mental stature until 
it is higher than that of other workers, such 
as peasants, but not without the latter acquiring a 
political interest and understanding at the same 
time. The chasm between these various classes is 
by no means an unbridgable one. 

Alongside of the classes of hand workers grows 
a section of intellectuals, which tends to become 
more numerous and increasingly necessary for the 
productive system. Their vocation calls for the 
acquisition of knowledge and the exercise and 
development of intelHgence. 

This section occupies a middle place between 
the proletariat and the capitalist class. It is not 
directly interested in capitalism, but is neverthe- 
less mistrustful of the proletariat, so long as it 
does not consider the latter to be capable of taking 
its fate into its own hands. Even such members 
of the cultured classes as most warmly espouse 
the cause of the freedom of the proletariat stand 
aloof from the Labour movement in the early 
stages of the class struggle. They only change 
their attitude when the proletariat shows increasmg 
capacity in its struggles. The confidence in the 
proletariat, which is thus inspired in intellectuals 
who enter the Socialist movement, is not to be 
confused with the trust which, since August 4, 

B 



' 60 . DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETABIAT 

19.14, the Liberal and Centre Parties, and even the 
Government of Germany, have placed in the 
Governmental Sociahsts. 

The first kind of confidence is bred by the con- 
viction that the proletariat has acquired the 
strength and capacity to free itself. The second 
sort of confidence comes with the conviction that 
the Socialists in question no longer take the prole- 
tariat's fight for freedom seriously. 

Without the help, or in opposition to the 
intellectuals, Socialist production cannot be 
instituted. In circumstances where the majority 
of the population mistrust the proletarian party, 
or stand aloof from it, this attitude would be 
shared by the bulk of the intellectuals. In that 
case, a victorious proletarian party would not only 
be without great intellectual superiority to the rest 
of the people, but would even be inferior to its 
opponents in this regard, although its outlook in 
general social matters might be a much higher 
one. 

The method/ of Paraguay is therefore not 
practicable in Europe. There remains to be con- 
sidered the method adopted by Napoleon the First 
on Brumaire 18, 1799, and his nephew, the 
third Napoleon, on December 2, 1852. This con- 
sists in governing by the aid of the superiority of 
a centralised organisation to the unorganised 



DICTATOBSHIP 61 

masses of the people, and the superiority ol 
mihtary power, arising from the fact that the 
armed forces of the Government is opposed to a 
people who are defenceless or tired of the armed 
struggle. 

Can a Socialist system of production be built up 
on this foundation? This means the organisation 
of production by society, and requires economic 
self-government throughout the whole mass of the 
people. State organisation of production by a 
bureaucracy, or by the dictatorship of a single 
section of the people, does not mean Socialism. 
Socialism presupposes that broad masses of the 
people have been accustomed to organisation, that 
numerous economic and political organisations 
exist, and can develop in perfect freedom. The 
Socialist organisation of Labour is not an affair of 
barracks. 

A dictatorship of a minority which grants to the; 
people the fullest freedom of organisation under- 
mines its own power by so doing. Should it seek, 
on the other hand, to maintain its authority by- 
restricting this freedom, it impedes development 
towards Socialism, instead of furthering it. 

A minority dictatorship always finds its most 
powerful support in an obedient army, but the 
more it substitutes this for majority support, the 
more it drives the opposition to seek a remedy by 



52 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

an appeal to the bayonet, instead of an appeal to 
that vote which is denied them. Civil war becomes 
the method of adjusting political arid social 
antagonisms. 

Where complete political and social apathy or 
dejection does not prevail, the minority dictator- 
ship is always threatened by armed attack, or 
constant guerilla warfare, which easily develops 
into a protracted armed rising of great masses, to 
cope with which all the military power of the 
dictatorship is needed. 

The dictatorship is then involved in civil war, 
and lives in constant danger of being overthrown. 

To the building up of a Socialist society there is 
no greater obstacle than internal war. In the 
present state of extensive geographical division of 
labour, the big industries are everywhere closely 
dependent on the security of communications no 
less than on the security of contract. External 
war would shake the Socialist society to its 
foundations, even if the enemy did not penetrate 
into the country. Russian Socialists of all sections 
in the present Revolution are right in urging the 
necessity of peace for the rebuilding of society. 

Yet civil war is far more harmful to a Socialist 
society than external war, as civil war is fought 
out in the land itself, and wastes and paralyses as 
much as a foreign invasion. 



DICTATOESHIP 53 

In the struggles of States it is usually only a 
question of an accession or loss of power on the* 
part of one or the other government, and not a 
matter of their very existence. After the war the 
various belligerent governments and peoples j^eek: 
to live in peace, if not in amity. 

The parties in a civil war are quite differently 
related to each other. They do not carry on the 
war to wrest some concessions from the opponents, 
and then to live with them in peace. And a civil 
war is also different from democracv, under which 
minorities are so protected that any party whicVi 
finds itself in this position, and is obliged to 
renounce hopes of being the Government, need not 
relinquish political activity. Every party which is 
reduced to a minority always retains the right to 
strive to become the majority, and thereby take 
over the Government. 

In a civil war each party fights for its existence, 
and the vanquished is menaced with complete 
destruction. The consciousness of this fact 
accounts for civil wars being so terrible. A 
minority which only retains control by military 
power is inclined to crush its opponents by the 
bloodiest means, and to decimate them in reck- 
less slaughter, when it is threatened by a revolt, 
and succeeds in repressing it. June, 1848, in 



54 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETABIAT 

Paris, and the bloody May week of 1871 have 
shown this with terrible distinctness. 

Chronic civil war, or its alternative under a 
dictatorship, the apathy and lethargy of the 
masses, would render the organisation of a 
Socialist system of production as good as impos- 
sible. And yet the dictatorship of Ihe minority, 
which either produces civil war or apathy, is to be 
the sovereign means for effecting the transition 
from Capitalism to Socialism ! 

Many people confuse civil war with the social 
revolution, considering this to be its form, and are 
therefore prepared to excuse the acts of force 
inevitable in a civil war. This has always been the 
case in revolutions, they say, and ever will be. 

We Social Democrats are decidedly not of the 
opinion that that which has been must always be. 
Such ideas of the revolution are formed on the 
examples of previous middle-class revolutions. 
The proletarian revolution will be accomplished 
under quite different conditions from these. 

The middle-class revolutions broke out in States 
in which a despotism, supported by an army 
separated from the people, suppressed all free 
movements, in which freedom of the Press, of 
public meeting, of organisation, and general 
suffrage did not exist, and in which there was no 
real representation of the people. There the 



DICTATORSHIP 65 

struggle against the Government necessarily took 
the form of a civil war. The proletariat of to-day 
will, as regards Western Europe at least, attain to 
power in States in which a certain measure of 
democracy, if not " pure '' democracy, has been 
deeply rooted for decades, and also in which the 
military are not so cut off from the people as 
formerly. It remains to be seen how the conquest 
of political power by the proletariat is achieved 
under these conditions, where it represents the 
majority of the people. In no case need we 
anticipate that in Western Europe the course of the 
great French Revolution will be repeated. If 
present-day Russia exhibits so much likeness to the 
France of 1793, that only shows how near it stands 
to the stage of middle-class revolution. 

The social revolution, the political revolution, 
and civil war must be distinguished from each 
other. 

The social revolution is a profound transforma- 
tion of the entire social structure brought about 
by the establishment of a new method of produc- 
tion. It is a protracted process, which may be 
spread over decades, and no definite boundaries 
can be drawn for its conclusion. It will be the 
more successful, according to the peaceful nature 
of the forms under which it is consummated. Civil 
and foreign wars are its deadly foes. As a rule a 



56 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PBOLETARIAT 

social revolution is brought about by a political 
revolution, through a sudden alteration in the 
relative strength of classes in the State, whereby a 
class hitherto excluded from the poUtical power 
possesses itself of the machinery of government. 
The political revolution is a sudden act, which is 
rapidly concluded. Its forms depend on the con- 
stitution of the State in which it is accomplished. 
The more democracy rules, not merely formally, 
but actually anchored in the strength of the work- 
ing classes, the greater is the likelihood that the 
political revolution will be a peaceful one. Con- 
trariwise, the more the system which has hitherto 
prevailed has been without the support of a 
majority of the people, and has represented a 
minority which kept control by military force, the 
greater is the likelihood that the political revolution 
will take the form of a civil war. 

Yet, even in the last case, the supporters of the 
social revolution have a pressing interest in seeing 
that the civil war is only a transitory episode 
which quickly terminates, that it is made to serve 
the* sole end of introducing and setting up demo- 
cracy, to whose pace the social revolution should 
be adapted. In other words, the social revolution 
must not, for the time being, be carried out farther 
than the majority of the people are inclined to go, 
because beyond this the Social Eevolution, desir- 



DICTATORSHIP 67 

able as it may seem to far-seeing individuals, would 
not find the necessary conditions for establishing 
itself permanently. 

But did not the Eeign of Terror of the proletariat 
and lower middle-class of Paris, that is the dicta- 
torship of a Minority, in the great French Revolu- 
tion, bring with it enormous consequences of the 
highest historical significance? 

Of course. But of what kind were thev? That 
dictatorship was a child of the war which the allied 
Monarchs of Europe had waged against Revolu- 
tionary France. To have victoriously beaten off 
this attack was the historical achievement of the 
Reign of Terror. Thereby is again proved 
distinctly the old truth, that dictatorship is better 
able to wage war than democracy. It proves in 
no M^ay that dictatorship is the method of the 
proletariat to carry through social transformations 
to its own liking, and to keep control of political 
power. 

In energy the Reign of Terror of 1793 cannot 
be surpassed. Yet the proletariat of Paris did not 
succeed, by this means, in retaining power. The 
dictatorship was a method by means of which the 
various fractions belonging to proletarian and small 
middle-class pohtics fought amongst themselves, 
and, finally, it was the means of making an end of 
all proletarian and lower middle-class politics. 



58 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PEOLETAEIAT 

The dictatorship of the lower classes opens the 
way for the dictatorship of the sword. 

Should it be said, after the example of the 
middle-class revolutions, that the Revolution is 
synonymous with civil war and dictatorship, then 
the consequences must also be recognised, and it 
must be added the Eevolution would necessarily 
end in the rule of a Cromwell or a Napoleon. 

This is, however, by no means the necessary 
upshot of a proletarian revolution where the prole- 
tariat forms the majority of the nation, which is 
democratically organised, and only in such cases 
do the conditions for Socialist production exist. 

By the dictatorship of the proletariat we are 
unable to understand anything else than its rule on 
the basis of democracy. 



CHAPTER VI. 

Constituent Assembly and Soviet. 

The contrast between democracy and dictatorship 
has just acquired an important significance in the 
Russian Revolution. The Socialists of Russia were 
from the first divided. They comprised Social 
Revolutionaries and Marxists. The Social Revolu- 
tionaries were, in the first place, the representa- 
tives of the peasantry, which in Russia, in contrast 
to all the rest of Europe, were still a revolutionary 
factor, and therefore could march with the 
Socialist proletariat. Against the Social Revolu- 
tionaries were the Marxists, the representatives of 
the industrial proletariat. These divided into 
two sections, the Mensheviks, who held that only 
a middle-class revolution was possible in the 
existing economic conditions in Russia, unless the 
revolution coincided with a European Socialist 
revolution, and the Bolsheviks, who always believed 
in the omnipotence of will and force, and now, 
without considering the backwardness of Russia, 
are trying to shape the Revolution on Socialist 

lines. . 

In the course of the Revolution the contrast 

59 



60 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETAEIAT 

became more acute. The Mensheviks considered 
it to be their task to take part in a Provisional 
Coalition Government until the duly constituted 
National Assembly had formed a definite govern- 
ment. The Bolsheviks endeavoured, even before 
the meeting of the National Assembly, to overthrow 
this Provisional Government, and replace it by 
government of their party. An additional ground 
of opposition came with the question of peace. 
The Mensheviks wanted immediate peace as much 
as the Bolsheviks, both wanted it on the basis of 
Zimmerwald — no annexations or indemnities. 
Both sections had been represented at Zimmerwald, 
and the Mensheviks had been in the majority there. 
But the Mensheviks wanted a general peace, and all 
belligerents to adopt the watchword — no annexa- 
tions or indemnities. So long as this was not 
achieved, the Eussian army should keep their arms 
in readiness. The Bolsheviks, on the other hand, 
demanded immediate peace at any price, and were 
ready, if necessary, to conclude a separate peace, 
and they sought to enforce their views by increas- 
ing the already great disorganisation of the army. 

They were supported by the war weariness of 
great masses in the army and among the people, as 
well as by the apparent inactivity of the Provisional 
Government, which, however, accomplished far 
more political and social reform than any other 



CONSTITUENT ASSEMBLY AND SOVIET 61 

middle-class government in the same period, 
although it did not do as mach as would be 
expected of a revolutionary government. The 
elections for the Constituent Assembly could not be 
so rapidly completed as was desired. It was first 
necessary to renew the old official machinery, and 
to create democratic town and country representa- 
tion. Enormous difficulties were met with in the 
compilation of voters' lists in the giant Empire, 
whose census took place in 1897. So the elections 
to the Constituent Assembly were constantly post- 
poned. 

Above all, peace was no nearer. Wherever the 
guilt for this may rest, the statesmen of the 
Entente did not understand how necessary it was 
for themselves at that time to pronounce in favour 
of no annexations or indemnities. They pursued 
a policy which made the Entente appear to the 
Russian people the obstacle to peace, and with 
them their Allies the Provisional Government. 
This was the reason why some of the Mensheviks, 
the Internationalists, demanded separation from 
the Entente, and went in opposition to the Provi- 
sional Government. Yet they did not go so far as 
the Bolsheviks. Under these circumstances, the 
Bolsheviks gained ground at the expense of the 
Mensheviks and the Provisional Government, 
which they succeeded in overthrowing in 



62 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

November, 1917. Their propaganda zeal proved 
to be so great that they were able to draw a part 
of the Social Revolutionaries to their side. The 
left Social Eevolutionaries henceforth marched 
with the Bolsheviks, into whose Government they 
entered, while the right and also the ^centre 
remained on the side of the Mensheviks. 

The Bolsheviks drew their strength from the 
great expectations which they raised. If they 
were to retain this strength, they had to fulfil these 
expectations. Was that possible? 

The Bolshevist Revolution was based on the sup- 
position that it would be the starting point of a 
general European Revolution, and that the bold 
initiative of Russia would summon the prqletariat 
of all Europe to rise. 

On these suppositions, it was of no moment what 
form was taken by the Russian separate peace, what 
humiliations and burdens it placed on the Russian 
people, and what interpretations it gave to the 
principle of the self-determination of peoples. And 
it was also a matter of indifference whether Russia 
was capable of defence or not. According to this 
theory, the European Revolution formed the best 
defence of the Russian Revolution, for it would 
bring to the peoples in territory hitherto Russian 
real and complete self-determination. 



UUJNSilTUiliJST^SSSEMlJLY AND SOVIET 63 

The Revolution which would bring about 
Socialism in Europe would also be the means of 
removing the obstacles to the carrying through of 
Socialism in Eussia which are created by the 
economic backwardness of that country. 

This was all very logically thought out, and quite 
well founded, provided the supposition was 
granted, that the Eussian Ee volution must 
inevitably unchain the European Eevolution, But 
what if this did not happen ? 

The supposition has not yet been realised. And 
now the proletariat of Europe is blamed for 
leaving the Eussian Eevolution in the lurch, and 
betraying it. This is a complaint against unknown 
people, for who can be made responsible for the 
inactivity of the European proletariat. 

It is an old Marxist saying that revolutions 

cannot be made, but arise out of conditions. The 

> conditions of Western Europe are, however, so 

different from those of Eussia that a revohition 

there would not necessarily provoke one here. 

When the Eevolution of 1848 broke out in 
France, it immediately spread over that part of 
Europe lying east of it. It, however, halted at 
the Eussian boundaries, and when the Eevolution 
was unchained in Eussia in 1905, it provoked 
strong suffrage movements in the countries to the 



64 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

west, although nothing that could be described as 
e revolution. 

But the Bolsheviks must not be too much 
blamed for expecting a European Ee volution. 
Other Socialists did the same, and we are certainly 
approaching conditions which will sharply 
accentuate the class struggle, and which may have 
many surprises in store. And if the Bolsheviks 
have up till now been in error in expecting a 
Eevolution, have not Bebel, Marx, and Engels 
cherished a like delusion? This is not to be denied. 

But the latter have never had in mind a revolu- 
tion at a specific time, and never elaborated their 
tactics in such wise that the existence of the 
party and the progress of the class struggle was 
made to be dependent on the outbreak of the 
Eevolution, so that the proletariat was confronted 
wath the dilemma : revolution or bankruptcy. 

Like all politicians they too have erred in their 
expectations. But such errors have never set 
them on a false track, and led them into a cul-de- 
sac. 

Our Bolshevist comrades have staked ^1 on the ' 
card of the general European Eevolution. As this 
card has not turned up, they were forced into a 
course which brought them up against insoluble 
problems. They had to defend Eussia without an 



CONSTITUENT ASSEMBLY AND SOVIET 65 

army against powerful and implacable enemies. 
They had to establish a regime of well-being for 
all in a state of general dislocation and impoverish- 
ment. The less the material and intellectual con- 
ditions existed for all that they aspired to, the more 
they felt obliged to replace what was lacking by 
the exercise of naked power, by dictatorship. 
They had to do this all the more the greater the 
opposition to them amongst the masses became. 
So it became inevitable that they should put dicta- 
torship in the place of democracy. 

If the Bolsheviks were deceived in their expecta- 
tions that they only needed to become the Govern- 
ment, in order to unchain the European Revolu- 
tion, they were not less so in the anticipation that 
they had only to grasp the helm of State, and the 
majority of the population would joyously range 
themselves behind them. As the Opposition under 
the conditions due to Russia's situation, they had 
indeed developed great propaganda strength, as we 
have already noted. At the beginning of the 
Revolution only a small handful, they became so 
strong eventually as to seize the power of the 
State. But had they the masses of the population 
behind them? This should have been revealed by 
the Constituent Assembly, which the Bolsheviks, 
like other revolutionaries, had demanded, and for 
a period even violently demanded ; the Constituent 



66 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PBOLETAEIAT 

Assembly, to be chosen by universal, equal, direct 
and secret suffrage. 

Immediately after the capture of the Govern- 
ment by the Bolsheviks, the new regime was con- 
firmed by the second AU-Eussian Congress of 
Soviets, albeit in opposition to a strong minority, 
which left the Congress protesting. But even the 
majority did not yet repudiate the idea of the Con- 
stituent Assembly. 

The resolution confirming the Soviet Govern- 
ment began with the words : *' Pending the calling 
together of the Constituent Assembly, a Provisional 
Workers' and Peasants' Government is to be 
formed, which is to be called the Council of 
People's Commissaries." 

The Constituent Assembly then is recognised 
here as taking precedence of the Council 
of People's Commissaries. On November 3 the 
Government dissolved the Town Council of Petro- 
grad on the ground that it was in conflict with the 
outlook of the people, as manifested by the Eevo- 
lution of November 7, and by ** the elections to the 
Constituent Assembly." The new members were 
proclaimed on the basis of the existing general 
franchise. Soon, however, a defect was discovered 
in the elections to the Constituent Assembly. 

On December 7, the All-Russian Executive Com- 
mittee of Soviets published a resolution, in which 



CONSTITUENT ASSEMBLY AND SOVIET 67 

it was stated: *' However the electoral arrange- 
ments of a body composed of elected representa- 
tives may be devised, these can only be considered 
to be truly democratic and really to represent the 
will of the people, when the right of recalling their 
members by the electors is recognised and exer- 
cised. This principle of real democracy applies to 
all representative bodies and also to the Constituent 
Assembly. The Congress of the Councils of Work- 
men's, Soldiers' and Peasants' Delegates, who are 
chosen on equal grounds, has the right to issue 
writs for a new election in the case of town and 
parish councils, and other representative bodies, 
not excluding the Constituent Assembly. On the 
demand of more than half of the electors of the 
circumscription in question the Council must order* 
a new election." 

The demand that the majority of the voters may 
at any time recall a deputy, who is no longer in 
agreement with their views, is entirely in accord- 
ance with the principles of democracy. But it is: 
not clear, from this standpoint, why the Soviets- 
should take the step of ordering new elections.. 
However, at that time this represented the widest 
interference with the Constituent Assembly that 
had been made. Neither the establishment of the 
Assembly, nor the elections were touched. 

But it was becoming ever clearer that the 



68 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETABIAT 

elections had not given the Bolsheviks the majority. 
Therefore, the Pravda of December 26, 1917, 
published a number of propositions relating to the 
Constituent Assembly, which Lenin had drawn up, 
and the Central Committee had accepted. One of 
them declared that the elections had taken place 
shortly after the victory of the Bolsheviks, but 
before the Social Revolutionaries had yet divided. 
The left and the right Social Revolutionaries had 
therefore had a common list of candidates. Con- 
sequently, the elections gave no clear indication of 
the real voice of the masses. 

Whoever entertained this view, in face of the 
above-mentioned proposition of December 7, was 
committed to the conclusion that new elections 
should be ordered to the Assembly in districts 
which had chosen social revolutionaries. To what 
other end had this resolution been drawn up ? Yet 
on December 26 it was already forgotten. And 
suddenly quite another song was heard in the 
other proposition of Lenin, with which we are 
here concerned. After he had shown us that the 
Assembly just elected was not suitable, because it 
did not express the real voice of the whole people, 
he declared that any assembly elected by the 
masses by general suffrage was not suitable : * * The 
Soviet Republic represents not only a higher form 
of democratic institutions (in comparison with the 



CONSTITUENT ASSEMBLY AND SOVIET 60 

middle-class republic and the Constituent Assembly 
as its consummation) it is also the sole form which 
renders possible the least painful transition to 
Socialism." 

It is only a pity that this knowledge was arrived 
at after one had been left a minority in the Con- 
stituent Assembly. Conflict with the Assembly 
was now inevitable. It ended with a victory for 
the Soviets, whose dictatorship as a permanent 
form of government in Eussia was proclaimed. 



CHAPTER VII. 

The Soviet Republic. 

The Soviet organisation was a product of the Russian 
Revolution of 1905. At that time the proletariat 
engaged in mass action, for which it required a 
form of mass organisation. The secret organisa- 
tion of the Social Democrats, as also of the Social 
Revolutionaries, only comprised hundreds of 
members who influenced some thousands of 
workers. Political and industrial mass organisa- 
tions could not be formed under the Absolutism of 
the Czar. The only mass organisations of the 
workers which existed when the Revolution came 
were those which had been brought into existence 
by the capitalists themselves and related to single 
trades. These now became mass organisations for 
the struggle of the proletariat. Each trade was 
now transformed from a place where material pro- 
duction was carried on into a place of political 
propaganda and action. The workers of each 
trade came together and chose delegates, who 
united to form a council of delegates, or a Soviet. 
It was the Mensheviks who gave the impulse to 
this most significant movement. Thus a form of 

70 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 71 

proletarian organisation was created, which 
became the most comprehensive of all because it 
included all wage earners. It has made powerful 
action possible, and left a deep impression in the 
consciousness of the worker. When the second 
Revolution broke out in March, 1917, the Soviet 
organisation again came to the fore, and this time 
upon a firmer basis, corresponding with the 
development undergone by the proletariat since 
the first Revolution . The Soviets of 1905 were 
local organisations confined to single towns. 
Those of 1917 were not only more numerous, but 
closely knit together. Single Soviets were affiliated 
to a greater body, which in its turn was part of an 
organisation comprehending the whole Empire, its 
organ being the AU-Eussian Congress of Soviets, 
and a permanent Central Executive Committee. 

Already the Soviet organisation can look back 
on a great and glorious history. A more important 
period lies before it, and not in Russia alone. 
Everywhere it is apparent that the usual methods 
of the political and economic struggle of the pro- 
letariat are not sufficient to cope with the enormous 
strength at the disposal of finance capital in the 
economic and political spheres. 

These methods need not be abandoned, as they 
are essential for ordinary conditions, but at times 
they are confronted with tasks to which they are 



72 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

not equal, and success is only likely with a com- 
bination of all the economic and political power of 
the proletariat. 

The Eussian Revolution of 1905 brought the 
idea of the mass strike to a head in the German 
Social Democracy. This fact was recognised by 
the 3905 Congress. That of 1906 endeavoured to 
allay the sensibilities and fears of the Trade Union 
officials. On the question of the mass strike, it 
resolved that when the executive should consider 
the necessity for the political mass strike to exist 
it should get into touch with the General Commis- 
s^ion of the Trade Unions, and concert all measures 
necessary to secure successful action. 

After all our experience with the mass strike, 
we know to-day that this resolution was funda- 
mentally wrong. For one reason because a mass 
strike is likely to be all the more successful by 
breaking out unexpectedly in a particular situar 
tion, with spontaneous suddenness. Its organisa- 
tion by party and Trade Union machinery would 
make necessary such preparations as would lead to 
its frustration. 

We, therefore, understand why the Trade Union 
bureaucracy tends to oppose all spontaneous 
action on a large scale. Trade Unions are abso- 
lutely necessary. The proletariat is the stronger 
the greater the number of its members, and the 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 73 

larger the financial resources of its Trade Unions. 
Widespread and permanent organisations, with 
many ramifications, are not possible without a 
machinery for permanent administration, that is 
a bureaucracy. The Trade Union bureaucracy is 
as essential as the Trade Union itself. It has its 
faults like Parhamentarism and Democracy, but is 
as indispensable as these for the emancipation of 
the proletariat. 

This is not, however, to say that all its preten- 
tions must be recognised. It should be restricted 
to its first function, in performing which it cannot 
be replaced; that is the administration of Trade 
Union funds, the extension of organisation, and 
the giving advice to the workers in their struggles. 
But it is unsuitable for leading that powerful mass 
strike which tends to become the characteristic of 
the times. 

By virtue of their experience and knowledge, 
Trade Union officials and Parliamentarians may 
here successfully assist, but the initiative tends to 
fall into the hands of Workshop Committees. In 
various countries outside Eussia, such as in 
England, these institutions (shop stewards) have 
played a big part in mass struggles, side by side 
with ordinary Trade Unionism, 

The Soviet organisation is, therefore, one of the 
most important phenomena of our time. It 



74 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

promises to acquire an outstanding significance in 
the great decisive struggles between Capital and 
Labour which are before us. 

Can we ask even more than this of the Soviets? 
The Bolshevists, who, together with the left-wing 
Social Eevolutionaries, obtained a majority in the 
Eussian Workers' Councils after the November 
Ee volution of 1917, after the dissolution of the 
Constituent Assembly, proceeded to make an organ 
of government of the Soviets, which hitherto had 
been the fighting organisation of a class. They 
did away with the democratic institutions which had 
been conquered by the Eussian people in the March 
Ee volution. Quite properly the Bolsheviks ceased 
to call themselves Social Democrats, and described 
themselves as Communists. 

Indeed, they did not repudiate democracy 
entirely. In his speech of April 28, Lenin des- 
cribed the Soviet organisation as a higher type of 
democracy, a complete break with its * ' middle- 
class distortion." Entire freedom was now 
secured to the proletarian and the poor peasant. 

Hitherto democracy had connoted equal poli- 
tical rights for all citizens. The sections privi- 
leged by law had always possessed freedom of 
movement. But one does not call that democracy. 

The Soviet Eepublic is to be the organ of the 
dictatorship of the proletariat, the only means, as 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 75 

Lenin expresses it, whereby the most painless 
transition to Socialism is made possible. This is 
to be done by depriving of political rights all those 
who are not represented in the Soviets. 

Why should this step make less painful the 
transition to Socialism than would be the case with 
universal suffrage? Obviously, because the 
capitalists are in this way excluded from the 
making of laws. 

Now there are two alternatives. Suppose the 
capitalists and their supporters are an insignificant 
handful. How could they then prevent the transi- 
tion to Socialism under universal suflFrage? On 
the contrary, universal suffrage would reveal 
them as an insignificant minority, and consequently 
they would the sooner resign themselves to their 
fate than if the franchise were so shaped that no- 
one could say with certainty which party had 
behind it a majority of the people. In reality, 
however, the capitalists cannot be deprived of 
rights. What is a capitalist in a legal sense? A 
possessor. 

Even in a country so highly developed econo- 
mically as Germany, where the proletariat is so 
numerous, the establishment of a Soviet Eepublic 
would disfranchise great masses of the people. In 
1907, the number of men, with their families, 
belonging to occupations which comprised the 



76 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

three great groups of agriculture, industry and 
trade, that is, wage-earners and salaried persons, 
amounted to something over 35,000,000, as 
against 17,000,000 belonging to other sections. 
A party could therefore very well have the 
majority of wage-earners behind it and yet form a 
minority of the population. On the other hand, 
when the workers vote together, they need not 
fear the united votes of their opponents. By 
obliging them to fight their common foes, universal 
suffrage causes them to close up their ranks 
sooner than if the political struggle were confined 
to the Soviets, from which the opponents are 
excluded, and in which the political struggle of a 
Socialist party takes the form of attacking another 
Socialist Party. Instead of class-consciousness, 
sectarian fanaticism is thereby induced. 

Now for the other alternative. Suppose the 
capitalists and their supporters are not a small 
minority, but a great mass which is well able, in 
a Parliament elected on the basis of universal 
suffrage, to constitute a respectable opposition? 

What purpose would be served by reducing this 
opposition to silence in the governing body? The 
capitahsts themselves are everywhere only a small 
section. But in comparison with the Socialists, 
their supporters may be very numerous. It 
should not be thought that only personal interest 



THE SOVIET KEPUBLIC 77 

or payment would induce people to enter the lists 
for capitalism. Except Socialism, capitalism is 
to-day the only possible method of production on a 
large scale. 

Who holds Socialism to be impossible, must, if 
he thinks in a modern sense at all, be for 
capitalism, even if he be not interested therein. 
Even of those backward sections, who are opposed 
to capitalism, many take their stand on the basis 
of private property in the means of production, 
and therefore on the basis on which capitalism 
grows. In a backward country, therefore, the 
number of those in the population who directly or 
indirectly would protect capitalism may be very 
large. Their opposition w^ould not be lessened if 
they were deprived of political rights. They would 
all the more energetically oppose the measures of 
the new tyrannical regime. By universal suffrage 
in a real democracy all classes and interests are 
represented in the governing body according to 
their strength. Every section and party may 
exercise the fullest criticism upon each Bill, show 
up all its weaknesses, and also make known the 
strength of the opposition which exists amongst 
the people. In the Soviet all hostile criticism is 
excluded, and the weaknesses of laws do not come 
so easily to light. The opposition which they 
arouse amongst the population is not learned in 
the first instance. 



78 DICTATOESIilP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

Only afterwards, when the law is promulgated, 
do criticism and opposition manifest tuemselves. 
Instead of during the debates, the weaknesses of 
laws come to light when they are put into operation. 
Even the Soviet Government has already, in the 
case of very important laws, been obliged, by 
supplements and lax administration, to let in by 
the backdoor elements that it solemnly threw out 
of the front door. 

That, as compared with general suffrage, vote 
by occupation has a tendency to narrow the outlook 
of the electors, we have already shown. That by 
this means the transition to Sociahsm is rendered 
painless is very much in doubt. 

Not less doubtful is the dictatorship of the prole- 
tariat under the Soviet regime. Dictatorship, 
certainly. But of the proletariat? 

In the economic structure of Russia the Soviets 
could only attain the position of rulers in 1917 by 
not confining themselves to the industrial prole- 
tariat of the towns, as in 1905. This time the 
soldiers and peasants were also organised in 
Soviets. With the disbanding of the army the 
soldiers have lost their numerical importance. The 
small army raised by the People,'s Commissaries 
was more useful to them, from the point of view 
of bayonets than of votes. Nevertheless, the vote?? 



THE SOVIET EEPUBLIC 7^ 

of the Eed Army have played a considerable part. 
In some Soviets, for example, at the latest elections 
in Petrograd the major portion of the mandates 
were reserved to its members. Of much more im- 
portance, however, were the votes of the peasants, 
who comprise the great majority of the Russian 
people. What is represented to us as the dictator- 
ship of the proletariat, if it were logically carried 
out and a class were able to exercise directlv the 
dictatorship which is only possible for a party, 
would turn out to be the dictatorship of the 
peasants. It would therefore appear that the least 
painful transition to Socialism is effected when it is 
carried out by the peasants. Although the peasants 
form the majority in the Soviet organisations, these 
do not include the whole of the proletariat. 

At first it was not clear who might organise in 
Soviets, and which Soviets might affiliate to the 
general organisation. It was thought by various 
people that every trade organisation might form 
a Soviet, and be regarded as such. 

On May 28, 1918, the Leipziger Volkszeitung 
published an article entitled the Soviet Eepubhc, 
which obviously came from Bolshevist sources. It 
was there stated : 

*' The Soviet representation is superior to 
democratic representation. It concedes to all 
citizens full and equal rights, and all classes in the 



80 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETABIAT 

land enjoy the full possibility of securing repre- 
sentation in the Soviets, exactly corresponding to 
their strength and special social importance. To 
this end they must be independently organised, 
not in parties, as hitherto, on the lines of demo- 
cracy, but in special classes or trade organisa- 
tions/' 

Legien and his friends may be very contented 
with this subordination of the Social Democratic 
Party to the Trade Unions, as well as the reac- 
tionaries who want to substitute a class vote for 
general suffrage. The champion of proletarian 
dictatorship continues : 

' * The middle classes as such have hitherto not 
been represented in the Soviets, because on the 
one hand, they have boycotted them, and on the 
other, are not disposed to be organised on the pro- 
letarian scheme, but not because they have been 
excluded/' 

Are they really not so disposed? Has our 
Bolshevist friend ever belonged to an employers' 
association, and does he think that the capitalist 
isolated under general suffrage is really more 
dangerous than an employers' association m a 
Soviet? 

But we are about to learn wherein consists the 
superiority of the Soviet organisation over general 
suffrage : '* It can obviously adopt the attitude of 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 81 

excluding any middle-class organisation from the 
Soviets." 

In other words, the Soviet organisation has the 
advantage over general suffrage of being more 
arbitrary. It can exclude all organisations which 
it considers obnoxious. It '' concedes full and 
equal rights to citizens," but '* obviously " they 
must only be exercised to the liking of the Sovie^ 
Government. 

Meanwhile, it has been discovered that this does 
not work. The last AU-Eussian Congress of 
Soviets, which terminated on July 12, 1918, 
drafted a constitution of the Russian Soviet 
Eepublic. This lays it down that not all the 
inhabitants of the Eussian Empire, but only 
specified categories have the right to elect deputies 
to the Soviets. All those may vote " who procure 
their sustenance by useful or productive work." 
What is '' useful and productive work "? This is 
a very elastic term. Not less elastic is the defini- 
tion of those who are excluded from the franchise. 
They include any who employ wage labourers for 
profit. A home worker or small master, -with an 
apprentice, may live and feel quite like a prole- 
tarian, but he has no vote. Even more prole- 
tarians may become disfranchised by the defini- 
tion which aims at depriving private traders and 
middle men of the vote. The worker who loses his 



82 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

work, and endeavours to get a living by opening a 
small shop, or selling newspapers, loses his vote. 

Another clause excludes from the franchise 
everyone who has unearned income, for example, 
dividends on capital, profits of a business, rent of 
property. How big the unearned income must be 
which carries with it loss of the vote is not stated. 
Does it include the possession of a savings bank- 
book? Quite a number of workers, especially in 
the small towns, own a little house, and, to keep 
themselves above water, let lodgings. Does this 
bring them into the category of people with 
unearned income. Not long since there was a 
strike at the Obuchovist Factory, '' this hotbed of 
the Eevolution," as Trotsky styled it in 1909 
(Russia in the Revolution, page 83). I asked a 
Bolshevist comrade how he explained this protest 
against the Soviet Government. 

" That is very simple," he said, " the workers 
there are all capitalists who own a little house." 

One sees how little it takes, according to the 
Constitution of the Soviet Republic, to be labelled 
a capitalist, and to lose the vote. 

The elasticity of the definition of the franchise, 
which opens the door to the greatest arbitrari- 
ness, is due to the subject of this definition, and not 
to its framers. A juridical definition of the prole- 
tariat, which shall be distinct and precise, is not to 
be had. 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 93 

I have not found a reference to the appointment 
of a specific authority which shall verify each 
person's vote, compile voting lists, and carry out 
the election, either by secret ballot or a show of 
hands. Clause 70 determines: ''The exact pro- 
cedure of election will be decided by the local 
Soviets, in accordance with instructions from the 
AU-Eussian Central Committee." 

In a speech of April 28, 1918, Lenin mentioned 
the following in connection with the Socialist 
character of the Soviets : (1) The voters are the 
working and exploited masses, only the middlf> 
classes being excluded; (2) All bureaucratic for- 
mality and restriction cease. The masses them- 
selves decide the procedure and the date of the 
elections. 

It seems, then, that any body of electors may 
order the electoral procedure according to their 
whims. This would give the greatest scope for 
arbitrary action, and make it possible to get rid of 
any inconvenient element of opposition within the 
proletariat itself. 

It need only be remarked in passing that the 
election to the regional Soviet is an indirect 
one, which in any case makes easy the influencing 
of elections to the detriment of the opposition. 

However, this has not prevented the opposition 
from coming to expression in the Soviets. 



84 DICTA TOKSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

The ' ' least painful transition ' ' to Socialism 
obviously requires the silencing of all opposition 
and criticism. So on June 14, 1918, the All-Rus- 
sian Central Committee passed this resolution : 

' ' The representatives of the Social Revolution- 
ary Party (the right wing and the centre) are 
excluded, and at the same time all Soviets of 
Workers', Soldiers', Peasants' and Cossacks' 
Deputies are recommended to expel from their 
midst all representatives of this fraction." 

This measure was not directed against particular 
persons, who had committed some punishable 
acts. Anyone offending in this way against the 
existing order would at once be imprisoned, and 
there would be no need to exclude him. There is 
no word in the constitution of the Soviet Eepublic 
respecting the immunity of deputies. Not par- 
ticular persons (but particular parties were thereby 
excluded from the Soviets. This means in practice 
nothing less than that all proletarians, who take 
their stand on the ground of party, lose their votes. 
Their votes are no longer counted. For this no 
specific clause exists. Clause 23 of the Constitu- 
tion of the Soviet Eepubhc determines : '* In the 
interests of the working class as a whole the 
Eussian Socialist Federal Soviet Eepubhc may 
withdraw rights from any persons or groups who 
misuse them to the detriment of the Socialist 
Eevolution." 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 85 

This declared the whole opposition to be out- 
laws. For every Government, even a revolution^ 
ary one, discovers that the opposition misuse their 
rights. Yet even this was not sufficient to ensure 
the painless transition to Socialism. 

Scarcely had the Bolsheviks got rid of the 
opposition of the Mensheviks and the Centre and 
Eight Wing of the Social Revolutionaries within 
the Soviets, when the great fight broke out 
between them and the left Social Revolutionaries, 
with whom they had formed the government. The 
greater part of these were now driven out of the 
Soviets. 

So within the proletariat itself the circle of 
those who participate in political rights, upon 
whom the Bolshevist regime rests, becomes evei 
smaller. Starting out with the idea of establish- 
ing the dictatorship of the proletariat the Bolshevist 
regime was bound to become the dictatorship of a 
party within the proletariat. Yet it might be for 
a long time the dictatorship of the majority of the 
proletariat over the minority. To-day even that 
has become doubtful. 

Nevertheless, every regime, even a dictator- 
ship, is under the necessity of appearing to be the 
expression of the needs of the majority, not merely 
of the proletariat, but of the whole people. Even 
the Bolsheviks cannot escape from this. 



86 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETAEIAT 

The Populaire of Paris, on July 6, 19.18, 
reported an interview which Longuet had with 
Litvinoff, the London Bolshevik Ambassador. 
Among other things Longuet remarked : 

*' You know, citizen Litvinoff, that even the 
comrades in the West, who have the strongest 
sympathy for your movement, are pained by the 
dissolution of the Constituent Assembly. I had 
already told you this on my own account, when I 
last saw you in January. Do you not think that, in 
order to meet the attacks that are made on you, 
you ought at any rate to hold new elections? " 

To which Litvinoff replied : 

'* This is not possible at the moment in view of 
the present situation. Democracy expressed m 
the form of the Soviets — a more precise expres- 
sion of the will of the masses — is the sole form of 
representation suitable to Eussia at the present 
time. Besides those who protested against the 
last Soviet elections, which were disastrous for 
them, would also oppose elections for a new 
Assembly, in which we should certainly have the 
majority." 

If Comrade Litvinoff and his friends are so sure 
of this, why do not they take steps to hold such 
elections. If these were held in the fullest free- 
dom, and gave a Bolshevist majority, the existing 
Government would gain a far stronger moral basis 



THE SOVIET REPUBLIC 87 

at home and abroad than ever it can win as a 
Soviet Government on the present methods of 
election and administration. Above all, Socialist 
critics would lose every ground of objection, and 
the whole International of the fighting proletariat 
would stand behind them with unanimity and 
with full force. 

Why renounce this enormous advantage if one is 
so sure of a majority? Because general suffrage 
is not suitable to Russia at the present time, and 
only the Soviet organisation meets its require- 
ments? But how can this assertion be proved? It 
is indeed understandable when one remembers 
that every Government likes to identify itself with 
the country, and to declare that what does not suit 
it is also not suitable for the country. 

One thing can certainly be granted. The 
present situation is not favourable to the sugges- 
tion of elections to a Constituent Assembly. At 
the time when the elections to the first Assembly 
were prepared and completed a certain amount of 
peace still prevailed in the interior. To-day all 
Russia is torn by civil war. Does, however, this 
record of nine months of the Soviet Republic fur- 
nish the proof that the Soviet organisation is the 
most suitable to Russia, and the one which least 
painfully effects the transition to Socialism? 



CHAPTER VIII. 



The Object Lesson. 



The pernicious features of the method of dictator- 
ship here discussed must now be contrasted with 
more favourable aspects. It furnishes a striking 
object lesson, and even if it cannot last it is able to 
accomplish many things to the advantage of the 
proletariat, which cannot be lost. 

Let us look closely at the object lesson. This 
argument obviously rests on the following con- 
sideration : Under democracy, by virtue of which 
the majority of the people rule, Socialism can only 
be brought about when a majority in its favour, is 
gained. A long and tedious way. We reach our 
goal far quicker if an energetic minority which 
knows its aims, seizes hold of the power of the 
State, and uses it for passing Socialist measures. 
Its success would at once compel conviction, and 
the majority, which hitherto had opposed, would 
quickly rally to Socialism. 

This sounds very plausible, and sounded so in 
the mouth of old Weitling. It has only the one 
defect that it assumes that which has to be proved. 

88 



THE OBJECT LESSON 89 

The opponents of the method of dictatorship con- 
test the assumption that Sociahst production can 
be brought about by a minority without the 
co-operation of the great mass of the people. If 
the attempt fails, it certainly is an object lesson, 
but in the wrong sense, not by attracting, but by 
frightening. 

People who are influenced by such an object 
lesson, and not by examining and verifying social 
relations, thoughtless worshippers of mere suc- 
cess, would, in the case of the attempt failing, not 
inquire from what causes it did not succeed. They 
would not seek for the explanation in the 
unfavourable or unripe conditions, but in 
Socialism itself, and would conclude that Socialism 
is realisable under no circumstances. 

It is apparent that the object lesson has a very 
dangerous side. 

How has it been represented to us? 

We may popularly express the essentials of 
Socialism in the words : Freedom and bread for 
all. This is what the masses expect from it, and 
why they rally to it. Freedom is not less important 
than bread. Even well-to-do and rich classes have 
fought for their freedom, and not seldom have 
made the biggest sacrifices for their convictions in 
blood and treasure. The need for freedom, for 



90 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

sell-determination, is as natural as the need for 
food. 

Hitherto Social Democracy did represent to 
the masses of the people the object lesson of 
being the most tireless champion of the freedom of 
all who were oppressed, not merely the wage- 
earner, but also of women, persecuted religions 
and races, the Jews, Negroes and Chinese. By 
this object lesson it has won adherents quite out- 
side the circle of wage-earners. 

Now, so soon as Social Democracy attains to 
power, this object lesson is to be replaced by one 
of an opposite character. The first step consists 
in the suspension of universal suffrage and of 
liberty of the Press, the disfranchisement of large 
masses of the people, for this must always take 
place if dictatorship is substituted for democracy. 
In order to break the political influence of the 
upper ten thousand, it is not necessary to exclude 
them from the franchise. They exercise this 
influence not by their personal votes. As regards 
small shopkeepers, home workers, peasants who 
are well off and in moderate condition, the greater 
part of the intellectuals, so soon as the dictator- 
ship deprives them of their rights, they are 
changed at once into enemies of Socialism by this 
kind of object lesson, so far as they are not 
inimical from the beginning. Thus all those who 



THE OBJECT LESSON 91 

adhere to Socialism on the ground that it fights for 
the freedom of all would become enemies of the 
proletarian dictatorship. 

This method will win nobody who is not already 
a Socialist. It can only increase the enemies of 
Socialism. 

But we saw that Socialism not only promised 
freedom, but also bread. This ought to reconcile 
those whom the Communist dictatorship robbed of 
freedom. 

They are not the best of the masses who are con- 
soled in their loss of freedom with bread and 
pleasure. But without doubt material well-being 
will lead many to Communism who regard it scep- 
tically, or who are by it deprived of their rights. 
Only this prosperity must really come, and that 
quickly, not as a promise for the future, if the 
object lesson is to be effective. 

How is this prosperity to be attained? The 
necessity for dictatorship pre-supposes that a 
minority of the population have possessed them- 
selves of the power of the State. A minority com- 
posed of those who possess nothing. The greatest 
weapon of the proletariat is, however, its numbers, 
and in normal times it can only progress on these 
lines, conquering the political power only when it 
forms the majority. As a minority it can only 
achieve power by the combination of extraordin- 



92 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

ary circumstances, by a catastrophe which causes 
the collapse of a regime, and leaves the State 
helpless and impoverished. 

Under such circumstances, Socialism, that is 
general well-being within modern civilisation, 
would only be possible through a powerful 
development of the productive forces which capi- 
talism brings into existence, and with tlie aid of the 
enormous riches which it creates and concentrates 
in the hands of the capitalist class. A State which 
by a foolish poUcy or by unsuccessful war has dissi- 
pated these riches, is by its nature condemned to 
be an unfavourable starting point for the rapid 
diffusion of prosperity in all classes. 

If, as the heir of the bankrupt State, not a demo- 
cratic but a dictatorial regime enters into power, it 
even renders the position worse, as civil war is its 
necessary consequence. What might still be left 
in the shape of material resources is wasted by 
anarchy. 

In fine, the uninterrupted progress of produc- 
tion is essential for the prosperity of all. The 
destruction of capitalism is not Socialism. Where 
capitalist production cannot be transformed at once 
into Socialist production, it must go on as before, 
otherwise the process of production will be inter- 
rupted, and that hardship for the masses will ensue 



THE OBJECT LESSON 93 

which the modern proletariat so much fears in the 
shape of general unemployment. 

In those places where, under the new conditions, 
capitalist production has been rendered impossible, 
Socialist production will only be able to replace ic 
if the proletariat has acquired experience in self- 
government, in trade unions, and on town councils, 
and has participated in the making of laws and the 
control of government, and if numerous intel- 
lectuals are prepared to assist with their services 
the new methods. 

In a country which is so little developed economi- 
cally that the proletariat only forms a minority, 
such maturity of the proletariat is not to be 
expected. 

It may therefore be taken for granted that in all 
places where the proletariat can only maintain 
itself in power by a dictatorship, instead of by 
democracy, the difficulties with which Socialism is 
confronted are so great that it would seem to be out 
of the question that dictatorship could rapidly 
bring about prosperity for all, and in this manner 
reconcile to the reign of force the masses of the 
people who are thereby deprived of political 
rights. 

As a matter of fact, we see that the Soviet 
Republic, after nine months of existence, instead 
of diffusing general prosperity, is obliged to explain 
how the general poverty arises. 



94 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PEOLETARIAT 

We have lying before us : ' * Theses respecting 
the SociaHst Revolution and the tasks of the pro- 
letariat during its dictatorship in Russia," which 
emanates from the Bolshevist side. A passage 
deals with ** the difficulties of the position." 

Paragraph 28 leads as follows: ''28. The 
proletariat has carried out positive organic work 
under the greatest difficulties. The internal 
difficulties are : The wearing out and enormous 
exhaustion of the social resources and even their 
dissolution in consequence of the war, the policy 
of the capitalist class before the October revolution 
(their calculated policy of disorganisation, in order, 
after the ' Anarchy,' to create a middle-class 
dictatorship), the general sabotage of the middle- 
class and the intellectuals after the October revolu- 
tion; the permanent counter-revolutionary revolt 
of the ex-officers, generals and middle classes, with 
arms or without; lack of technical skill and experi- 
ence on the part of the working-class itself 
(italicised in original), lack of organising experi- 
ence; the existence of large masses of the small 
middle class, which are an unorganised class, 
par excellence, etc." 

This is all very true. But it does not indicate 
anything else than that the conditions are not ripe. 
And does it not strikingly show that an object lesson 



THE OBJECT LESSON 95 



.'<^ 



on the lines of Socialism is, under these conditions 
in present-day Russia, not to be thought of? It is 
a famous object lesson which makes it necessary for 
theoretical arguments to be set out why that 
which is to be shown is not possible at the moment. 
Will it convert those who have hitherto opposed 
Socialism, and who are only to be convinced by 
its practical success? 

Of course, a new regime will come up against 
unexpected difficulties. It is wrong to lay the 
blame for them on this regime, as a matter of 
course, and to be discouraged by them without 
closer examination of the circumstances. But if 
one is to persevere, in spite of these difficulties, 
then it is necessary to win beforehand a strong 
conviction of the justice and necessity of this 
regime. Only then will confusion be avoided. 
Success worshippers are always uncertain Can- 
tonists. 

So we are driven back upon democracy, which 
obliges us to strive to enlighten and convince the 
masses by intensive propaganda before we can 
reach the point of bringing Sociahsm about. We 
must here again repudiate the method of dictator- 
ship, which substitutes compulsory object lessons 
for conviction. 

This is not to say that object lessons may avail 
nothing in the realisation of Socialism. On the 



96 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PKOLETABIAT 

contrary, they can and will play a great part in 
this, but not through the medium of dictatorship. 

The various States of the world are at very 
different stages of economic and political develop- 
ment. The more a State is capitalistic on the one 
side and democratic on the other, the nearer it is 
to Socialism. The more its capitalist industry is 
developed, the higher is its productive power, the 
greater its riches, the more socially organised its 
labour, the more numerous its proletariat ; and the 
more democratic a State is, the better trained and 
organised is its proletariat. Democracy may some- 
times repress its revolutionary thought, but it is 
the indispensable means for the proletariat to attain 
that ripeness which it needs for the conquest of 
political power, and the bringing about of the social 
revolution. In no country is a conj9.ict between the 
proletariat and the ruling classes absent, but the 
more a country is progressive in capitalism and 
democracy, the greater is the prospect of the pro- 
letariat, m such a conflict, of not merely gaining 
a passing victory, but also of maintaining it. 

Where a proletariat, under such conditions, 
gains control of the State, it will discover sufficient 
material and intellectual resources to permit it at 
once to give the economic development a Socialist 
direction, and immediately to increase the general 
well-being. 



THE OBJECT LESSON 97 

This will then furnish a genuine object lesson to 
countries which are economically and politically 
backward. The mass of their proletariat will now 
unanimously demand measures on the same lines, 
and also all other sections of the poorer classes, as 
well as numerous intellectuals, will demand that 
the State should take the same road to general 
prosperity. ' Thus, by the example of the pro- 
gressive countries, the cause of Socialism will 
become irresistible in countries which to-day are 
not so advanced as to allow their proletariat of its 
own strength to conquer the power of the State, 
and put Socialism into operation. 

And we need not place this period in the distant 
future. In a number of industrial States the 
material and moral prerequisites for Socialism 
appear already to exist in sufficient measure. The 
question of the political dominion of the prole- 
tariat is merely a question of power alone, above 
all of the determination of the proletariat to engage 
in resolute class struggle. But Eussia is not one of 
these leading industrial States. What is being, 
enacted there now is, in fact, the last of middle \ 
class, and not the first of Socialist revolutions.'/ 
This shows itself ever more distinctly. Its present 
Eevolution could only assume a Socialist character 
if it coincided with SociaUst Revolutions in Western 
Europe. 

H 



98 JDICTATOBSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

That by an object lesson of this kind in the more 
highly-developed nations, the pace of social 
development may be accelerated, was already 
recognised by Marx in the preface to the first 
edition of '' Capital " : 

^ ' One nation can and should learn from others . 
And even when a society has got upon the right 
track for the discovery of the natural laws of its 
movement — it can neither clear by bold leaps, nor 
remove by legal enactments the obstacles offered 
by the successive phases of its normal development. 
But it can shorten and lessen the birth-pangs." 

In spite of their numerous calls on Marx, oui" 
Bolshevist friends seem to have quite forgotten 
this passage, for the dictatorship of the proletariat, 
which they preach and practise, is nothing but a 
gi'andiose attempt to clear by bold leaps or remove 
by legal enactments the obstacles offered by the 
successive phases of normal development. They 
think that it is the least painful method for the 
delivery of Socialism, for ' ' shortening and lessen- 
ing its birth-pangs.'' But if we are to continue in 
metaphor, then their practice reminds us more of 
a pregnant woman, who performs the most foolish 
exercises in order to shorten the period of gesta- 
tion, which makes her impatient, and thereby 
causes a premature birth. 



THE OBJECT LESSON 99 

The result of such proceedings is, as a rule, a 
child incapable of Ufe. 

Marx speaks here of the object lesson which one 
nation may afford another. Socialism is, however, 
concerned with yet another kind of object lesson, 
viz., that which a highly-developed industry may 
furnish to an industry which is backward. 

To be sure, capitalist competition everywhere 
tends to displace old-fashioned industrial methods, 
but under capitalist conditions this is so painful a 
process that those threatened by its operation 
strive to avert it by all means. The Socialist 
method of production would therefore find in exist- 
ence a number of processes which are technically 
obsolete; for example, in agriculture, where large- 
scale production has made Uttle progress, and iu 
places is even receding. 

Socialist production can only develop on the* 
basis of the large industry. Socialist agriculture 
would have to consist solely in the sociaHsation of 
"what large-scale production already exists. If 
good results are thereby obtained, which is to he 
expected, provided the social labour of freely- 
organised men is substituted for wage labour, 
(which only produces very inadequate results iu 
agriculture) the conditions of the workers in the 
large Socialist industry will be seen to be more 
favourable than those of the small peasants, and it 



100 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETARIAT 

may then be anticipated with certainty that the 
latter will voluntarily pass over to the new produc- 
tive methods, when society furnishes them with the 
necessary means. But not before. In agriculture 
the way for Socialism is not prepared by Capitalism 
in any adequate measure. And it is quite hopeless 
to try to convince peasant proprietors of the 
theoretical superiority of Socialism. Only the 
object lesson of the socialisation of peasant agri- 
culture can help. This, however, presupposes a 
certain extension of large-scale agriculture. The 
object lesson will be the quicker and more effective 
according to the degree of development of large- 
scale industry in the country. 

The policy of the lower middle class democrats, 
which has been taken up by Social Democrats of 
the David school, and in some respects made more 
extreme, that is, the destruction of any large-scale 
agriculture and its partition into small-scale indus- 
try, is sharply opposed to Socialism as applied to 
agriculture, and therefore to Sociahsm as applied 
to society generally. 

The most striking feature of the present Eussian 
Eevolution is its working out on the linfes of 
PMuard David. He, and not Lenin, has given the 
Eevolution its peculiar direction in this respect. 
That is the Socialist instruction which it imparts. 
It testifies, in fact, to its middle-class character. 



CHAPTEE IX. 

The Legacy of the Dictatorship. 
(a) Agriculture. 

Dictatorship is not only going to furnish the best 
object lesson for Socialist propaganda, but will also 
hasten progress towards Socialism, by its actions, 
in the event of its not maintaining itself and 
collapsing before the goal has been reached. Its 
supporters expect that it will leave behind much 
that cannot be set on one side, and that it has 
cleared out of the way much that cannot be again 
established. 

This conception, too, like so many others, is 
based on the observation of the great French 
Eevolution, the middle-class revolution, under the 
influence of which remain those who stigmatise as 
''middle class," and reject, all that does not suit 
them, and for whom democracy is only a middle- 
class prejudice. 

The observation is correct, but the conclusions to 
be drawn are other than those of the supporters of 
dictatorship . The latter may be able to achieve more 
radical things than democracy, but what accom- 
panies it is not always what the dictators want. 
However high the dictatorship may be raised above 

101 



102 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PKOLETAEIAT 

all other powers in the State, it is always dependent 
upon one of them : that is the material foundations 
of society. These conditions, and not the will of 
the dictators, decide what the final consequences 
of the dictatorship will be. 

The strongest driving force of the Eeign of 
Terror in the French Revolution was the proletariat 
and the semi-proletarian classes of Paris. What 
they desired was the equaUsation of all property, 
the destruction of large properties. This they 
succeeded in doing in various ways. But they 
destroyed only more thoroughly than has happened 
in other parts of Europe the vestiges of feudalism, 
and thereby more effectively opened the way for 
the coming of the new capitalist large property, 
which shot up like a fungus immediately after the 
downfall of the Eeign of Terror. That, and in 
nowise economic equality, was the legacy of that 
dictatorship of the equalitarians. 

In order to understand what the economic legacy 
of the present dictatorship of the Soviets will 
be, we must not only take account of their 
intentions, desires and measures, but of the 
economic structure of the Empire. It is decisive. 

This examination may appear to many as tedious 
pedantry, incompatible with the revolutionary fire 
which burned in a Marx. No one can say with 
certainty what Marx would have thought and done 



AU^itiuujjxujivxij 103 

in the present situation. But it is certain that this 
tedious pedantry is the only procedure which is 
compatible with historical raaterialism, the founda- 
tion of which is one of the indisputable merits of 
Marx. A man who beheved that in a question of 
knowledge mere enthusiasm was to be accounted 
higher than experience would have been pushed on 
one side by Marx as an empty phrasemonger. 

The economic foundation of present-day Eussia 
is still agriculture, and even small peasant agri- 
culture. By it live four-fifths, perhaps even five- 
sixths of its inhabitants. In the year 1913 the 
town population of Eussia (excluding Finland) was 
computed at 24 millions, and those living by the 
land were 147 millions. The overwhelming majority 
of the latter are peasants. The Eevolution has 
altered nothing in these conditions. Puring the 
past year they have even been strengthened. 
Numerous workers have returned to the land. In 
the towns hunger has been more devastating than 
amongst the peasants. 

Until the Eevolution the peasants lived under a 
semi-feudal yoke. Serfage had indeed been 
abolished by the Eeforih of 1861, and the peasant 
formally made a free man. But this was not the 
work of a revolution, but the work of a patriarchal 
absolutism, which in a fatherly spirit provided that 
the big landowners should lose nothing by the 



104 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PKOLETARIAT 

Reform, but should rather gain. The peasant had 
to pay for his freedom with the loss of a part of the 
land which, prior to the Reform, he had used, and 
had to pay dear for the land which would be 
granted to him. The average size of a peasant' << 
holding was certainly larger than in Western 
Europe. Before the Revolution the peasants' 
holdings of less than five hectares in Russia com- 
prised only 10.6 per cent, of the total, whereas in 
France 71.4 per cent, of the holdings were five 
hectares and less, and in Germany 76.5 per cent. 
But Russian agriculture is so backward through 
the ignorance of the peasants, primitive appli- 
ances, lack of cattle and manure, that it produces 
far less than in Western Europe. In France 70.5 
pud of wheat (1 pud = 16.38 kilogrammes) is 
raised from every hectare, in Germany 77 pud, but 
in Russia only 28.2 pud. (Massloff : the Russian 
Agrarian Question.) 

The peasant was therefore soon after his eman- 
cipation in a worse material position than before. 
He became impoverished, and his industry did not 
progress, but rather declined. To avoid star- 
vation, he was obliged to rent plots of land from 
the large land-owners, or, where these were them- 
selves engaged in large-scale agriculture, to work 
for wages. Mostly, he was obliged to obtain an 
advance for the work he was to do, which brought 



AGEICULTUEE 105 

him into a state of indebtedness that was often 
more oppressive and hopeless than his former 
serfdom. This state of affairs was not improved 
by the peasant taking his produce to the markets, 
whether home or foreign. This put money in his 
pocket, and made it possible for him to save, which 
could, however, only be done at the cost of the 
peasant's sustenance. Formerly, he had con- 
sumed the greater part of his produce himself, 
because he had no other outlet. Now that he 
found an outlet, he sold as much as possible, and 
kept as little as possible back. So every year of 
failure became a year of hunger. So far as the 
peasant could save money, he did not spend it to 
improve his methods, but to obtain more land. 

In the period between 1863 and 1892, agricul- 
tural land in European Eussia was 

Million Roubles. 
Bought. Sold. 

By nobles 821 ... 1,459 

By merchants 318 ... 135 

By peasants 335 ... 93 

The land of the nobles decreased, and that of 
the peasants increased as compared with the 
middle class of the towns. But the land population 
increased more rapidly still, and so on the average 
there was a decrease in the area belonging to each 
peasant, although the total holdings of the 



106 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

peasants slightly increased. At the same time, 
under the influence of money transactions, aided 
by the legislature, the village communism, which 
from time to tinie had been instrumental in 
equalising the land holdings of individual peasants, 
disappeared more and more. Individuals were 
prosperous, but the others were the more 
impoverished. Both, however, prosperous and 
poor peasants, looked ever more greedily to the 
great land-owners, from whom they expected 
their salvation. They longed far the overthrow 
of landed property, and became a revolutionary 
class. Their longing found expression and form 
through the revolutionary intellectuals of the 
towns. The Sociahsts of Eussia were agreed 
that a revolution in the ownership of land was as 
essential for Eussia as the overthrow of the Czarist 
absolutism. But the Socialists were divided mto 
two sections. The one believed that primitive 
village communism would enable the peasants, and 
with them all Eussia, to attain to Socialism at one 
bound, although it may be a Socialism of their 
own. This shade of opinion found various expres- 
sions, the chief being the Social Eevolutionaries. 
The Marxists opposed them on the ground that 
Eussia, as little as other countries, *' could clear 
by leaps or remove by legal enactments the 
obstacles offered by the successive phases of 



ACjJKi(JULTU±t±i ' 107 

normal development," that the coming Revolution 
could only clear away the vestiges of Feudalism, 
and accelerate the capitalist development, on the 
basis of which would grow up a proletariat trained 
by the newly-won democracy, which, then, being 
on the same level as the proletariat of Western 
Europe, would be able to achieve Sociahsm at the 
same time as the latter. 

All Socialists without distinction were agreed in 
supporting the peasants in their endeavours to 
remove the vestiges of Feudahsm. This was 
distinctly brought to the mind of the peasant in 
the Eevolution of 1905. From then onwards the 
co-operation of peasants and Socialists, namely, 
through the means of the Social Revolutionaries, 
assumed a closer character. Thus after the 
Revolution of 1917 the organisation of the Soviets 
arose as not merely a proletarian, but also a 
peasant institution. 

The Revolution made possession of large estates 
untenable. This became obvious at once. It was 
inevitable that they should be transferred to the 
peasant population, although there was by no 
means agreement as to the methods of carrying 
this out. Various solutions were conceivable. 
From the Socialist standpoint, the most rational 
would have been to transform the large estates 
into State property, and have them worked on a 



108 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PKOLETAEIAT 

co-operative basis by the peasants, who had 
hitherto been engaged on them as wage-earners. 
However, this solution presupposed an agricultural 
class which Eussia did not possess. Another 
solution would have been for the big landed estates 
to become State property, and to be divided into 
small parcels to be rented to the peasants who 
needed land. Even that would have been a partial 
realisation of Socialism. But the small peasant 
holders strove where they could to obtam full 
private property in their means of production. 
This character they have hitherto displayed every- 
where, and the Eussian peasant, in spite of the 
tradition of village communism, is no exception. 
The breaking up of landed estates and their parti- 
tion — that was his programme, and he was strong 
enough to carry it out. No one could hinder him. 
In the interests of the peasants themselves, it 
would have been nevertheless very desirable that 
the partition should be systematically carried out, 
and the land given to those who needed it the 
most, and could also use it. There was only one 
authority which could have effected such a 
systematic partition, and that was the Constituent 
Assembly, as representing the collective will of 
the nation, of whom the great majority were 
peasants. 

But this was too long to wait. The peasants 



AGRICULTUKHi 109 

began everywhere to help themselves, which 
caused many valuable productive implements to be 
destroyed. The Soviet Organisation then removed 
from the purview of the Constituent Assembly the 
settlement of the Agrarian question, and left it to 
the peasants of every commune to seize the big 
estates, and proceed with their partition according 
to their whim. One of the first resolutions of the 
Soviet Government ordered that 

(1) Private property in land rs forthwith 
abolished, without compensation. 

(2) The property of the landlords, together 
with the appurtenances, cloisters, and 
church property, with all hve-stock and 
chattels, and other belongings, pending the 
decision of the land question by the Consti- 
tuent Assembly, shall be placed at the 
disposal of the Local Committees and the 
Councils of Peasants' Deputies. 

The reference to the Constituent Assembly 
remained a dead letter. In practice the peasants 
of the locahties took what they wanted of the 
estates. 

This necessarily excluded any equalisation 
between rich localities, containing rnany substan- 
tial peasants, and poor neighbourhoods contain- 
ing none but small peasants. Within the individual 
communes no record was made of those who 



110 13ICTAT0ESHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

obtained the land. Where the rich peasants 
dominated, either by their numbers or their 
influence, they obtained the hon share of the big 
estates. No general statistics regarding the parti- 
tion of the land were compiled, but it was fre- 
quently stated that, as a rule, the big peasants 
came away with most of the land that was parti- 
tioned. 

It is certain that the Soviet Republic has not 
solved the Agrarian question on the lines of 
an equitable division of the land. At the beginning 
the peasant Soviets constituted an organisation of 
the peasants alone. To-day it is announced that 
the Soviets represent the organisation of the prole- 
tariat and the poor peasants. The well-to-do have 
lost their right of voting in the Soviets. The poor 
peasant is here recognised as the colossal and 
permanent product of the Socialist agrarian reform 
of the dictatorship of the proletariat. This peasant 
is very likely in the minority in many villages, 
otherwise there was no object in protecting him by 
disfranchising the prosperous and medium 
peasants. But in any case he still forms a very 
considerable fraction of the Russian peasantry. 

By this partition of property the Soviet Republic 
sought to appease the peasants. It would have 
been dangerous for it to interfere even slightly 
with peasant private property. 



AGEICULTUEE 111 

To be sure it encroached on the relations 
between rich and poor peasants, but not by a fresh 
partition of the land. To remedy the lack of food 
in the towns detachments of armed workers were 
sent into the villages, to take away from the rich 
peasants their surplus food. Part of this was 
assigned to the population of the towns, and part 
to the poor peasants. These were indeed only 
temporary measures of urgency, confined to certain 
areas, the environs of the large towns. To carry' 
them out thoroughly the armed force of the towns 
would have been quite inadequate. In no case 
could such measures have sufficed to effect an 
equalisation between the rich and poor on the land, 
even if regularly repeated year by year. And in 
the last resort they might prove an effective means 
completely to ruin agriculture. 

K private production were carried on, and its 
produce calculated in such wise that the producer 
would have taken from him everything over what 
was necessary for his needs, he would produce 
only the indispensable minimum. This is one of 
the reasons for the decay of agriculture in many of 
the countries living under Oriental despotism, in 
which the tax collector takes from the peasant the 
surplus above that which is indispensable. A 
similar fate is likely to overtake Russia. Socialism 
will effect an adjustment between economic 



112 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

differences by the socialisation of the means and 
methods of production, thus making society the 
owner of the products. By this means it is able to 
increase production to the maximum, and dis- 
tribute the produce in accordance with social 
requirements and justice. 

On the other hand, to allow private property in 
the means of production, and private production 
itself to continue, and then regularly to confiscate 
the surplus, leads to the ruin of production, 
whether it be done in the interests of an Oriental 
despotism or of a proletarian dictatorship. Of 
course in cases where such proceedings may be 
thought desirable as a temporary measure of 
urgency, this may not happen, as it may some- 
times be necessary to do this. It is the reverse 
with the present expropriation of the well-to-do 
peasants. This does not alter in the least the 
structure of Eussian society, it only introduces a 
new cause of unrest, and carries civil war into the 
domain of production, the continuance of which is 
so pressing a need for the Government's peace and 
security. Moreover, if the dictatorship of the 
Soviets had the will and the strength to undertake 
a fresh partition of the land, and to do this equit- 
ably, it would not help the peasants much, as under 
the present primitive methods the cultivated land 



AGEICULTUKE 113 

in Eussia would not suffice to give enough land to 
each peasant to raise him out of poverty. 

As MasslofE rightly says in the book already 
quoted from : ' ' An attempt to put agriculture on 
the basis of equality would only be realised as a 
state of general poverty. To try to make all rich, 
while maintaining private property in the means of 
production is a vulgar Utopia of the lower-middle 
classes. If this kind of equality is not realisable, 
there is, on the other hand, in many countries, an 
equality of poverty already existing, and any 
extension of such a state of affairs can inspire no 
one. Whatever additions may be made to peasant 
property, there will always be too little land to 
permit all peasant agriculture to be prosperous. 
The endeavour to bring the life of the peasant into 
the orbit of the lower middle-class ideal, economic 
equality of small property, is not only Utopian, but 
also reactionary." 

With the present numbers of the population, and 
the existing area of cultivation, a general raising 
of the social standard of the Eussian peasant, 
cannot be accomplished by any method of parti- 
tioning the land. It can only be achieved when 
higher productive forms prevail, which require a 
general improvement in the education of the agri- 
cultural population, and a larger supply of cattle, 
implements, machinery, and artificial manure to be 



114 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETABIAT 

at their disposal, all of which conditions can only 
be introduced with difficulty and patience where 
small agriculture is the rule. 

If the conditions necessary for intensive 
capitalist agriculture have only been slightly 
developed in Eussia, and have even suffered a 
temporary set-back through the revolution, it is 
clear that the conditions for Socialist agriculture 
do not exist there, as they can only arise on 
the basis of large-scale agriculture with highly- 
developed technical appliances. Large-scale pro- 
duction can only be made to pay by technical 
appliances, the application of science, the most 
complete equipment of machinery, and the use of 
up-to-date methods, accompanied by a consider- 
able division of labour. Therefore, new methods 
of production can only be introduced and become 
permanent in places where advantages can be 
derived, either in the form of an increased product 
or in that of the saving of labour. In view of the 
primitive appliances and the ignorance of the 
small Russian peasants, it is hopeless to introduce 
large-scale agriculture. To be sure, in Bolshevist 
circles, mention is made from time to time of the 
introduction of Socialist agriculture, after the big 
estates have been broken up and divided amongst 
the peasants. We have already referred to the 
theses respecting the Russian Revolution and the 



AGRICULTUKE 115 

tasks of the proletariat during its dictatorship in 
Russia. No. 24 of these reads: **The complete 
expropriation of the land owners must be now 
mentioned. Land was decreed to exist for the 
general good. Additional tasks are the following : 
organisation of agriculture by the State, collective 
working of the former big estates, association of 
the small holdings into larger unities, with collec- 
tive self-government (so-called agricultural com- 
munes)." 

This which was said to be the task is, unfoi*- 
tunately, not yet fulfilled. Collective agriculture 
is, for the time being, in Eussia condemned to 
remain on paper. Nowhere, and at no time, are 
small peasants persuaded, on the ground of theory,. 
to go in for collective production. The Peasants' 
Associations include all possible branches of 
economy, and not merely the fundamental one of 
cultivating the land. Small scale agriculture 
necessarily creates everywhere the endeavour to 
separate single plots of land from one another, and 
is favourable to private property in land. Thus it 
has happened in Europe and America, and the pro- 
cess repeats itself throughout the world. Is the 
Russian peasant such an exceptional phenomenon 
as to be exempt from the operation of this general 
law ? Whoever considers him as an ordinary man 
and compares him with the peasants of the rest of 



116 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PROLETABIAT 

the world will declare it to be an illusion that ^ 
Socialist economy can be built up on the basis of 
present Eussian agriculture. 

The Revolution has only achieved in Eussia what 
it effected in France in 1789 and what its after- 
math achieved in Germany. By the removal of the 
remains of feudalism it has given stronger and 
more definite expression to private property than 
the latter had formerly. It has now made of the 
peasants, who were formerly interested in the 
overthrow of private property in land, that is, the 
big estates, the most energetic defenders of the 
newly-created private property in land. It has 
strengthened private property in the means of 
production and in the produce, which are 
conditions from which capitaUst production will 
constantly arise, although it may be disturbed or 
even destroyed for a time. 

Even the poor peasants are not thinking of giving 
up the principle of private property in land. Not 
by collective production do they seek to improve 
their lot, but by increasing their own share of land, 
that is, their own private property. That thirst for 
land, which always characterises the peasant, has 
now, after the destruction of the big estates, made 
of him the strongest defender of private property. 
The peasant has shown himself to be such in all 
countries where feudalism has been overcome, and 



AGEICULTURE llf 

therefore he is fostered and pampered by the^ 
ruhng classes as their most trustworthy defender. 

This will be the most certain and lasting result 
of the present dictatorship of the proletariat and 
the poorest peasants in Eussia. 

The interest of the peasant in the revolution 
therefore dwindles so soon as his new private 
property is secured. He will rise against any 
power which would re-establish at his cost the old, 
large land-owners, but he has no interest in going 
beyond this. With his interest in the revolution 
w^ill disappear his interest in his erstwhile allies, 
the town proletariat. 

The less the peasant produces for his own need 
and the more he produces for the market, and is 
obliged to rely upon his money income, so much 
the greater becomes his interest in high prices for 
his produce. This becomes his dominating interest 
after feudahsm has been abolished. This does not, 
however, bring him into antagonism to the large 
land-owners, whose interests are the same as his, 
and who become his aUies, but it brings him into 
opposition to the non -agricultural and town popu- 
lation, above all, to the workers, who must spend 
a larger portion of their incomes upon food than 
the middle classes, and consequently have the 
greatest interest in lowering the prices of the 
necessaries of life. 



118 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PBOLETAMAT 

So long as feudalism exists, the peasant and the 
lower classes in the towns make the best allies. 
This was shown in their struggles from the time of 
the German Peasants* War of 1625 to the time of 
the French Revolution of 1789. As soon as the 
middle-class revolution was accomplished, the 
peasants commenced to go over to the camp which 
is opposed to the town proletariat. Not only the 
prosperous peasants are to be found there with the 
big land-owners, but also the small peasants, even 
in democratic repubUcs like Switzerland. The 
small peasants do not go over to this side all at 
once, but gi'adually, according as the traditions of 
feudalism become fainter, and production for the 
market replaces production for their own need. 
Even in our own ranks the idea has been cherished, 
which Marx also referred to in his writings on the 
Civil War in France, that the peasants in the 
coming proletarian revolution would march with 
the proletariat like they did in the middle-class 
revolutions. Even yet the Governmental Socialists 
are looking for an Agrarian programme which will 
instil in the peasants an interest in the proletarian 
class struggle : but, in practice, growmg opposition 
is everywhere revealed between the proletariat 
and the peasants. Only those dwellers in the 
country have the same interest as the town prole- 
tariat, who are themselves proletarians, that is, 



who do not live by the sale of their produce, but 
by the sale of their labour power, by wage labour. 
The victory of the proletariat depends upon the 
extension of wage labour in the country, which is 
a protracted process, a process which is slowly 
accomplished by the increase of large-scale 
agriculture, but more quickly promoted by the 
removal of industries to the country. At the same 
time, the proletarian victory depends upon the 
town and industrial population increasing more 
rapidly than the country and agricultural popu- 
lation. The latter is a process that goes rapidly 
forward. In most industrial States the country 
'population suffers not only a relative, but an 
absolute decrease. In the German Empire the 
country population comprised 26.2 millions out of 
41 millions, in 1871, that is, 64.4 per cent, of the 
population. In 1910 it was 25.8 out of 65 millions, 
or 40 per cent. The agricultural population is 
smaller still than the country population. When 
the first occupation census was taken in 1882, the 
agricultural population was still 19.2 out of 45.2 
millions, or 42.5 per cent, of the total population. 
In 1907 it was only 17.7 out of 61.7 millions, or 
28.7 per cent. Of these 17.7 millions only 11.6 
millions were independent producers, 5.6 miUions 
being wage-earners and the rest officials. The 
peasant population, therefore, only amounts to 



120 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PROLETAEIAT 

one-sixth of the total population of the German 
Empire. On the other hand, already m 1907, the 
proletariat, with about 34 millions, comprised more 
than half of the population. Since then, it has 
certainl}^ grown still more, and is not far off the 
point of becoming two-thirds of the population. 

The conditions in Russia are of quite another 
character. We have already shown how over- 
whelming is the preponderance of the peasants. 
Their co-operation with the proletariat has made 
possible the victory of the revolution, but it also 
testifies to the middle-class character of the 
revolution. The more it is completed and 
strengthened in this sense, that is, the more secure 
the newly-created peasant property is made, the 
more will the ground be prepared, on the one side 
for capitalist agriculture, and on the other for a 
growing opposition between the peasant and 
proletariat. The economic. tendencies working in 
this direction are all-powerful in present day 
Eussia, and the most forcible dictatorship would 
not avail to counteract them. Rather will it 
strengthen them in the shape of a dictatorship of 
the peasants. 

(b) Industry. 

The industry of Russia is a different thing from 
its agriculture. Russian industry exhibits many 
primitive forms, but the capitalist portion of it, just 



INDUSTRY 121 

because of its recent growth, shows its most 
. modern and highly-developed form. And the 
Russian industrial working class, by the side of 
numerous iUiterates, who come from the country 
and are still limited by the narrow conceptions of 
the village, contains not a few members who have 
absorbed all the modern culture that is now 
available to the proletariat, who are filled with the 
same interest in theory which Marx praised in the 
German workers half a century ago, and are dis- 
tinguished by that thirst for knowledge which is 
so often stifled amongst the workers of Western 
Europe by the petty details inherent in democratic 
conditions. 

Could not a Socialist system of production be 
constructed on this foundation? 

This is only conceivable if Socialism means that 
the workers in single factories and mines should 
appropriate these themselves, in order to administer 
each one separately. 

Even as I write (August 5), a speech of Lenin's 
in Moscow, on August 2, is just to hand, which 
reports him as saying, ''The workers retain 
possession of the factories and the peasants will 
not give back the land to the landlords." 

The saying '* The factories to the workers and 

, the land to the peasants ' ' was recently not a social 

democratic, but an anarchist-syndicahst demand. 



122 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

Social democracy demanded that the factories and 
land should belong to society. The individual 
peasant can, in case of need, work his property 
without any connection with other producers. The 
modern factory, on the other hand, stands in a 
network of social connections, and its isolation is 
inconceivable. It is not enough for the workers 
to take over a factory, even if they are sufficiently 
intelligent and trained to direct it properly. A 
factory cannot run for a single day without supplies 
from other industries, raw material, coal, and 
auxihary products of all kinds, and without the 
regular sale of its products. If raw material and 
the mines and transport services fail, then the 
factory fails as well. Its operation on Socialist 
lines presupposes the creation of a network of 
social production. Only when society can do this, 
is Socialist production possible. 

Social democracy does not demand the trans- 
ference of factories to their workers, but strives 
for social production, that is, production for the 
needs of society in place of commodity production, 
and this is only possible through the social owner- 
ship of the means of production. Even the 
Bolshevists have declared for the nationalisation of 
factories, not their transference to the hands of the 
workers. The latter would only mean a change to 
a new form of capitalism, as experience has shown 



INDUSTKY 128 

in the numerous cases of co-operative production. 
The new owners would defend their property, as 
giving them a privileged position, against labourers 
seeking work, whose numbers must constantly be 
recruited through the insufficient share of land 
falling to the peasantry. 

A permanent conquest of capitahsm is not 
possible by giving over the factories to the workers 
engaged in them, but only by transferring the 
means of production to the possession of society, 
that is, the whole body of consumers, for whose 
need production is carried on. Thus they become 
State property, or, in the case of local means of 
production, belong to the commune, and eventually 
also to associations of consumers. 

This has even been attempted in Russia to-day. 
How far it has been carried out is not yet dis- 
closed. This side of the Soviet Republic is, in any 
case, of the greatest interest for us, but, unfor- 
tunately, we are still completely in the dark. 
There is, indeed, no lack of decrees, but trust- 
worthy information concerning the operation of 
the decrees is absent. Socialist production is 
impossible without comprehensive, detailed, reliable 
statistics, which give early information. Hitherto, 
the Soviet Republic has not been able to obtain 
these. What we learn about its economic effects 
is highly contradictory and is not susceptible of any 



124 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETAEIAT 

verification. This is again one of the results of the 
dictatorship and the suppression of democracy. 
Where freedom of the Press and speech is lacking, 
there can be no central and representative body, 
in which all classes and parties are represented, 
and can express themselves, and the actuai ' 
dictatorship is exposed to the temptation of only 
allowing to be published the information which 
suits it. Whether or not the dictators take advan- 
tage of this pojssibiUty, no rehance is placed on their 
information. This does not silence criticism, which 
merely seeks underground channels. It is spread 
by word of mouth almost as quickly as a public 
announcement, but without the restraint of 
publicity. Eumour knows no bounds. Thus, we 
are overwhelmed from left to right with informa- 
tion which is contradictory, and we are obliged to 
maintain an attitude of distrust towards it all. 

What results have been forthcoming from the 
Socialist endeavours of the Soviet Government 
cannot, therefore, yet be estimated, not even 
approximately. Is it possible for it to accomphsh 
something in this respect, w^hich will not again be 
lost, but will become permanent, in the event of 
the Soviet Government not being able to retain its 
power? 

That it has radically destroyed capitalism can be 
accepted by no one. It can certainly destroy much 



- INDUSTRY 125 

capitalist property, and transform many capitalists 
into proletarians, but this is not equivalent to the 
establishment of a Socialist system of production. 
So far as it does not succeed in doing this, capi- 
taUsm will again arise, and must arise. Probably 
h will reappear very quickly and bring a change 
in the personnel of the dictatorship of the prole- 
tariat. In the place of the former capitalists, now 
become proletarians, will enter proletarians or 
intellectuals become capitalists. These people 
will always skim off the cream, and will remain on 
' the side of the Government which is last on the 
field, and brings order out of chaos. 

The Soviet Government has already been con- 
strained to make various compromises with capital. 
On April 28, 1918, Lenin admitted in his before- 
quoted speech (reported in the News Service of the 
International Socialist Commission) that the expro- 
priation of capital had proceeded too quickly : 
'' If we are to expropriate at this pace, we shall be 
certain to suffer a defeat. The organisation of 
production under proletarian control is notoriously 
very much behind the expropriation of the big 
masses of capital." 

But everything depends upon this organisation. 
There is nothing easier for a dictator than to expro- 
priate. But to create a huge organism of social 



126 DICTATOBSHIP OF THE PBOLETAEIAT 

labour, and set it in motion, a Decree and the Eed 
Guard will not suffice. 

Even more than Eussian capital, German capital 
will cause the Soviet Eepublic to recoil and recog- 
nise its claims. How far the capital of the Entente 
will again penetrate into Eussia is still questionable. 
To all appearance, the dictatorship of the prole- 
tariat has only destroyed Eussian capital in order 
to make room for German and American capital. 

However this may be, it is reas6nable to antici- 
pate that the nationalisation of many branches of 
industry, for which the Soviet Government has 
paved the way, will persist, even if the Soviet 
Eepubhc should be destroyed, and, after the des- 
truction of the big estates, this will constitute the 
most considerable permanent achievement of the 
dictatorship of the proletariat. 

This is all the more probable, as it is part of a 
movement which is going on in all modern States, 
/even if they are capitahst. The needs of the 
war were responsible for it — we remember the 
nationalisation of the American railways — and the 
needs of peace will ensure its continuance. 

Everywhere we must be prepared for fiscal 
monopoly. 

But this shows that nationalisation is not yet 
Socialism. Whether it is so or not depends on the 
character of the State. 



INDUSTRY 127 

Now the Russian State is a peasant State. It i& 
so to-day more than ever, for the peasant has now 
learned to make his own power felt. In Eussia he 
is as little as elsewhere in a position to exercise 
his power directly in the State, as his conditions of 
life do not fit him for this. But he will no longer 
suffer the rule of any power which does not 
champion his interest, even if it be that of the town 
proletariat. 

Like peasant commodity production, the State 
industries will also have to produce for the market,^ 
not for the State's own needs. Their most con- 
siderable market — the home one — will comprise 
the peasants. 

Even as much as he is interested in high prices 
for agricultural produce, which he sells, is the 
peasant interested in low prices for industrial 
products, which he buys. As against private enter- 
prise, it is a matter of indifference to him how 
these low prices come to pass, whether at the 
expense of labour or of profit. He has no interest 
in high profits for private industrial capital. 

It is, however, otherwise with State industry. 
The higher the profits of this, the lower is the 
amount of revenue to be provided by taxes, which, 
in a peasant State, must be chiefly borne by the 
peasants. The peasant is accordingly as much 
interested in high profits for State industry as he 



128 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETAKIAT 

is in low prices for its products : this means lower 
wages for labour. 

Thus we see here another source of antagonism 
between peasant and industrial worker, an 
antagonism which will become the more marked 
the greater the extension which State industry 
undergoes. 

This antagonism, and not Socialism, will be the 
real legacy of the Russian Revolution. 

It would, nevertheless, be false to ascribe the 
responsibility for this to Bolshevism. Much of 
what they are reproached with is the necessary 
consequence of the conditions which confronted 
them, and would have disclosed itself quite 
as certainly under any other regime. Yet it is of 
the essence of dictatorship that it intensifies all 
existing antagonisms and raises them to their 
highest point. 

The famine has not been created by the dictator- 
ship, but by the mismanagement of Czarism and the 
war. But the fact that agriculture and the transport 
services have so slightly recovered in the half year 
following peace is the result of the civil war, which, 
under the dictatorship, is the only form of opposi- 
tion, and is inevitable when the masses cherish 
lively political interest. 

Again, the demobilisation of the army was a 
process which the Bolsheviks found going on. Yet 



they have prided themselves on accelerating it to 
the utmost, and thereby were obliged to conclude 
a peace which is no longer a source of satisfaction 
to them. 

In the same way, the breaking up of the big 
estates among the peasants was a proceeding which 
had already started before the Bolsheviks seized 
the political power, and which, owing to the over- 
whelming numbers of the peasants, nobody could 
have hindered. Yet the dissolution of the Con- 
stituent Assembly has contributed to it, in that the 
last trace of social influence on the assignment of 
the expropriated big estates has been lost, and the 
partition has been left to the naked arbitrariness 
of the interests on the spot. 

Finally, the appearance of the antagonism 
between peasant and industrial worker is also 
a phenomenon which could not be avoided, and 
which necessarily arises out of the prevailing 
economic conditions. Yet even here the 
Bolshevist rule has forced the growth of condi- 
tions which have sharpened and deepened the 
antagonism. With the dissolution of the Constituent 
Assembly and the demobihsation of the Army the 
two factors disappeared which could have furnished 
Russia with the quickest protection against the 
breaking up and partition of the land. Precisely 
the richest agricultural tracts of former Eussia are 



130 DICTATOBSHIP OF THE PROLETAEIAT 

now detached from it. If they so remain, then 
Eussia will cease, especially if Siberia also 
separates, to be altogether a corn or food exporting 
country. The prices of the agricultural produce of 
Eussia will then be determined only by the home, 
and not by the foreign market. 

Now this is the condition in wnicn, under 
commodity production, the opposition between 
peasant and industrial worker most quickly 
develops. In countries which largely export 
agricultural produce, the opposition between 
industry and agriculture takes the form of an 
antagonism of States rather than of classes, the 
form of an antagonism between an industrial 
State and an agricultural State. Eussia, in 
particular, has now, through the peace of Brest- 
Litowsk, ceased to be an agricultural exporting 
State, and has shaped in such a w^ay as to promote 
the most rapid and bitter economic struggle 
between peasants and industrial workers. 

In any case, this struggle cannot be avoided. So 
much the more important is it for a .far-seeing 
policy to give such a form to the conditions in 
which this struggle must be carried on as to make 
possible to the proletariat the best development of 
its strength. To lay these foundations, not only 
as against capital, but also as against agriculture — 
this was, during the Eevolution, the most 



iJNJJUbiiti 131 

important task of the representatives of the 
Eussian proletariat. Nothing else than the secure 
establishment of democracy could have done this. 

This task of the proletarian struggle for 
freedom, which is not less important than the 
institution of social production, is, in contrast to 
the latter, practicable in an agrarian State. 

The peasants, like all sections of the working 
class, demand democracy. They may find them- 
selves very well off in a democratic republic, as is 
shown in Switzerland and the United States But 
the political interests of the peasant seldom 
extend beyond the confines of his village, in con- 
trast with the industrial proletarian, whose 
emancipation requires him to dominate the whole 
machinery of the State, which can be no local act. 
The peasant can also become enthusiastic for an 
emperor, who protects his property and fosters his 
interest, as he did in the case of Napoleon the 
First. The Russian peasant would oppose any 
return of the Czarist regime, which in his eyes 
was connected with the return of the old, deadly- 
hated landlords. But a dictator, who secured him 
in his property, and allowed him to devote all his 
attention to the cultivation of his fields and the sale 
of their produce, such a dictator might under 
circumstances be as welcome to him as the 
Ilepublic. For this Dictator Ihe way has been 



132 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PROLETAEIAT 

prepared by the suspension of Democracy, and the 
proclamation of the dictatorship of a class, which 
is in reality the dictatorship of a party, and, as 
Lenin himself has stated, can become the dictator- 
ship of a single person. In his speech of April 28 
he said : 

' ' The closer we approach the complete suppres- 
sion of the middle class, the more dangerous the 
factor of small middle class anarchism will be for 
us. The struggle against it can only be carried on 
by force. If we are no anarchists, we must 
recognise the necessity of a State, that is a 
forcible transition from Capitalism to Socialism. 
The kind of force will be determined by the degree 
of the development of the revolutionary class 
concerned, as well as by special circumstances, 
such as reactionary war and the form taken by the 
opposition of the middle and lower middle classes. 
Therefore no essential contradiction can exist 
between the Soviet, that is, the Socialist democracy, 
and the exercise of dictatorial power by a single 
person.'* 

In the long run nothing can be more dangerous 
to the Eussian Proletariat than to familiarise the 
peasant with the idea that dictatorship, the dis- 
franchising of all opponents, the suspension of the 
suffrage, and of freedom of the Press and of 
organisation as regards every antagonistic class, is 



IJNJJUBTltY 133 

I 

the form of government which beet corresponds 
to the interests of the working classes. What will 
then become of the town workers if they come into 
conflict with the enormous mass of the Eussian 
peasants and a dictator who is recognised by them? 

And what will become of the workers when their 
own dictatorship collapses? The alternative to the 
dictatorship of a party is its destruction. Dictator- 
ship impels the party which is in possession of 
power to maintain it by all means, whether fair or 
foul, because its fall means its complete ruin. 

With democracy it is quite otherwise. Democracy 
signifies rule of the majority, and also protection 
of the minority, because it means equal rights and 
an equal share in all political rights for everybody, 
to whatever class or party he may belong. The 
proletariat everywhere has the greatest interest in 
democracy. Where the proletariat represents the 
majority, democracy will be the machinery for its 
rule. Where it is in the minority, democracy 
constitutes its most suitable fighting arena in which 
to assert itself, win concessions, and develop. If 
a proletariat which is in a minority attains to 
power, in alliance with another class, through a 
momentary conjunction of forces, it is most short- 
sighted ''real" politics, that is, politics of the 
passing moment, to endeavour to perpetuate this 
position by the suppression of democracy and the 



134 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PEOLETABIAT 

rights of minorities in opposition. It would destroy 
the ground on which alone a firm footing could be 
retained, after the passing of this phase, for further 
work and an extended struggle. 

It is problematical whether the Russian 
proletariat has now gained more real and practical 
acquisitions through the decrees of the Soviet 
Republic than it would have gained through the 
Constituent Assembly, in which Socialists, even if 
of another colour than those in the Soviets, 
predominated. But it is certain that if the Soviet 
Republic collapses many of its achievements are 
likely to fall along with it. 

Had the Constituent Assembly succeeded in 
strengthening democracy, then, at the same time, 
all the advantages which the industrial proletariat 
might have acquired by its agency would have been 
consolidated. To-day we rest our expectations 
that the Russian proletariat will not be cheated of 
all the fruit of the Revolution only on the supposi- 
tion that the dictatorship will not succeed in stifling 
democratic consciousness in the Russito people, 
and that, after all the errors and confusions of the 
civil war, democracy will finally be triumphant. 

Not in dictatorship, but in democracy, lies the 
future of the Russian proletariat. 



CHAPTER X. 

The New Theory. 

We have seen that the method of dictatorship does 
not promise good results for the proletariat, either 
from the standpoint of theory or from that of the 
special Eussian conditions; nevertheless, it is 
understandable only in the light of these conditions. 
The fight against Czarism was for a long time a 
fight against a system of government which had 
ceased to be based on the conditions prevailing, but 
was only maintained by naked force, and only by 
force was to be overthrown. This fact would 
easily lead to a cult of force even among the 
revolutionaries, and to over-estimating what could 
be done by the powers over them, which did not 
repose on the economic conditions, but on special 
circumstances. Accordingly, the struggle against 
Czarism was carried on secretly, and the method of 
conapiracy created the manners and the habits 
'proper to dictatorship, and not to democracy. 
^ The operation of these factors was, however, 
crossed by another consequence of the struggle 
against Absolutism. We have already referred to 

135 



136 DICTATOBSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

the fact that, in contradistinction to democracy, 
which awakens an interest for wider relations 
and greater objects side by side with its constant 
preoccupations with momentary ends. Absolutism 
arouses theoretical interest. There is to-day, 
however, only one revolutionary theory of society, 
that of Karl Marx. 

This became the theory of Eussian Socialism. 
Now what this theory teaches is that our desires and 
capabilities are limited by the material conditions, 
and it shows how powerless is the strongest will 
which would rise superior to them. It conflicted 
sharply with the cult of mere force, and caused 
the Social Democrats to recognise that definite 
boundaries were set to their participation m the 
coming Eevolution, which, owing to the economic 
backwardness of Russia, could only be a middle- 
class one. 

Then the second Eevolution came, and suddenly 
brought a measure of power to the Socialists which 
surprised them, for this Eevolution led to the 
complete demobilisation of the Army, which was 
the strongest support of property and middle class 
order. And at the same time as the physical 
support collapsed, the moral support of this order 
went to pieces, neither the Church nor the 
Intellectuals being able to maintain their preten- 
sions. The rule devolved on the lower classes in 



THE NEW THEOEY 137 

the State, the workers and peasants, but the 
peasants do not form a class which is able itself to 
govern. They wilhngly permitted themselves to be 
led by a Proletarian Party, which promised them 
immediate peace, at whatever price, and immediate 
satisfaction of their land hunger. The masses of 
the proletariat rallied to the same party, which 
promised them peace and bread. 

Thus the Bolshevist Party gained the strength 
which enabled it to seize political power. Did this 
not mean that at length the prerequisite was 
obtained which Marx and Engels had postulated for 
the coming of SociaUsm, viz., the conquest of poli- 
tical power by the proletariat? In truth, economic 
theory discountenanced the idea that Socialist 
production was realisable at once under the social 
conditions of Russia, and not less unfavourable to 
it was the practical confirmation of this theory, that 
1 the new regime in no way signified the sole rule of 
I the proletariat, but the rule of a coalition of 
proletarian and peasant elements, which left each 
' section free to behave as it liked on its own 
territory. The proletariat put nothing in the way 
of the peasants as regards jthe land, and the 
peasants put no obstacle in the way of the 
proletariat as regards the factories. None the less, 
.a Socialist Party had become the ruler in a great 
State, for the first time in the world's history. 



138 DICTATOESHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

Certainly a colossal and, for the fighting proletariat, 
a glorious event. 

But for what can a Socialist Party use its power 
except to bring about Socialism? It must at once 
proceed to do so, and, without thought or regard, 
clear out of the way all obstacles which confront it. 
If democracy thereby comes in conflict with the 
new regime, which, in spite of the great popularity 
which it so quickly won, cannot dispose of a 
majority of the votes in the Empire, then so much 
the worse for democracy. Then it must be replaced 
by dictatorship, which is all the easier to 
accomplish, as the people's freedom is quite a new 
thing in Russia, and as yet has struck no deep roots 
amongst the masses of the people. It was now the 
task of dictatorship to bring about Socialism. This 
object lesson must not only suffice for the elements 
in its own country which are still in opposition, but 
must also compel the proletariat of other capitalist 
countries to imitation, and provoke them to 
Revolution. 

This was assuredly a train of thought of out- 
standing boldness and fascinating glamour for 
every proletarian and every Socialist. What we 
have struggled for during half a century, what we 
have so often thought ourselves to be near, what 
has alwavs as^ain evaded us, is at length going to be 
accomplished. No wonder that the proletarians of 



THE NEW THEOEY 139 

all countries have hailed Bolshevism. The reality 
of proletarian rule weighs heavier in the scale than 
theoretical considerations. And that consciousness 
of victory is still more strengthened by mutual 
ignorance of the conditions of the neighbour. It is 
only possible for a few to study foreign countries, 
and the majority beUeve that in foreign countries it 
is at bottom the same as with us, and when this is 
not believed, very fantastic ideas about foreigners 
are entertained. 

Consequently, we have the convenient concep- 
tion that everywhere the same Imperialism prevails, 
and also the conviction of the Eussian Socialists 
that the political revolution is as near to the peoples 
of Western Europe as it is in Russia, and, on the 
other hand, the belief that the conditions necessary 
for Socialism exist in Eussia as they do in Western 
Europe. 

What happened, once the Army had been 
dissolved and the Assembly had been proscribed, 
was only the consequence of the step that had been 
taken. 

All this is very understandable, if not exactly 
encouraging. On the other hand, it is not so 
conceivable why our Bolshevist comrades do not 
explain their measures on the ground of the 
peculiar situation in Eussia, and justify them in the 
light of the pressure of the special circumstances. 



140 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PBOLETARIAT 

which, according to their notions, left no choice 
but dictatorship or abdication. They went beyond 
this by formulating quite a new theory, on which 
they based their measures, and for which they 
claimed universal application. 

For us the explanation of this is to be found in 
one of their characteristics, for which we should 
have great sympathy, viz., their great interest in 
theory. 

The Bolshevists are Marxists, and have inspired 
the proletarian sections coming under their 
influence with great enthusiasm for Marxism. Their 
dictatorship, however, is in contradiction to the 
Marxist teaching that no people can overcome the 
obstacles offered by the successive phases of their 
development by a jump, or by legal enactment. 
How is it that they find a Marxist foundation for 
their proceedings? 

They remembered opportunely the expression, 

I *^ the dictatorship of the proletariat," which 

i Marx used in a letter written in 1875. In so doing 

\ he had, indeed, only intended to describe a 

political condition, and not a form of government. 

Now this expression is hastily employed to designate 

the latter, especially as manifested in the rule of 

the Soviets. 

Now if Marx had somewhere said that under 
certain circumstances things might come to a 



THE NEW THEORY 141 

dictatorship of the proletariat, he has described 
this condition as one unavoidable for the transition 
to Socialism. In fact, as he declared, almost at the 
same time that in countries like England and 
America a peaceful transition to Socialism was 
possible, which would only be on the basis of 
democracy and not of dictatorship, he has also 
shown that he did not mean by dictatorship the 
suspension of democracy. Yet this does not 
disconcert the champions of dictatorship. As Marx 
once stated that the dictatorship of the proletariat 
might be unavoidable, so they announce that the 
Soviet Constitution, and the disfranchising of its 
opponents, was recognised by Marx himself as the 
form of government corresponding to the nature of 
the proletariat, and indissolubly bound up with its 
rule. As such it must last as long as the rule oi the 
proletariat itself, and until Socialism is generally 
accomplished and all class distinctions have dis- 
appeared. ' 

In this sense dictatorship does not appear to be 
a transitory emergency measure, which, so soon as 
calmer times have set in, will again give place to 
democracy, but as a condition for the long duration 
of which we must adapt ourselves. 

This interpretation is confirmed by Theses 9 and 
10 respecting the Social Eevolution, which state : 



142 DICTATOKSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

'* (9) Hitherto, the necessity of the Dictatorship 
of the Proletariat was taught, without enquiring as 
to the form it would take. The Eussian Socialist 
Revolution has discovered this form. It is the form 
of the Soviet Republic as the type of the permanent 
Dictatorship of the Proletariat and (in Russia) of 
the poorer classes of peasants. It is therefore 
necessary to make the following remarks. We are 
speaking now, not of a passing phenomenon, in the 
narrower sense of the word, but of a particular 
form of the State during the whole historical epoch. 
What needs now to be done is to organise a new 
form of the State, and this is not to be confused 
with special measures directed against the middle 
class, which are only functions of a special State 
organisation appropriate to the colossal tasks and 
struggle. 

'' (10) The proletarian dictatorship accordingly 
consists, so to speak, in a permanent state of war 
against the middle class. It is also quite clear that 
all those who cry out about the violence of the 
Communists completely forget what dictatorship 
really is. The Revolution itself is an act of naked 
force. ^ The word dictatorship signifies in all 
languages nothing less than government by force. 
The class meaning of force is here important, for 
it furnishes the historical justification of revolu- 
tionary force. It is also quite obvious that the 



m-^ THE NEW THEORY 143 

more difficult the situation of the Revolution 
becomes, the sharper the dictatorship must be.'* 

From the above it is also apparent that Dictator- 
ship as a form of government is not only to be a 
permanent thing, but will also arise in all countries. 

If in Eussia now the newly-acquired general 
freedom is put an end to again, this must also 
happen after the victory of the proletariat in 
countries where the people's freedom is already 
deeply rooted, where it has existed for half 
a century and longer, and where tJie people 
have won it and maintained it in frequent 
bloody revolutions. The new theory asserts this 
in all earnestness. And stranger still it finds 
support not only amongst the workers of 
Eussia, who still remember the yoke of the old 
Czardom, and now rejoice to be able to turn the 
handle for once, even as apprentices when they 
become journeymen rejoice when they may give the 
apprentices who come after them the drubbing 
they used to receive themselves — ^^no, the new 
theory finds support even in old democracies hke 
Switzerland. 

Yet something stranger still and even less 
understandable is to come. 

A complete democracy is to be found nowhere, 
and everywhere we have to strive after modifica- 
tions and improvements. Even in Switzerland 



144 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PHOLETAEIAT 

there is an agitation for the extension of the legis- 
lative powers of the people, for proportional 
representation and for woman suffrage. . In 
America the power and mode of selection of the 
highest judges need to be very severely restricted. 
Far greater are the demands that should be put 
forward by us in the great bureaucratic and 
militarist States in the interests of democracy. 
And in the midst of these struggles, the most 
extreme fighters raise their heads, and say to the 
opponents : That which we demand for the protec- 
tion of minorities, the opposition, we only want so 
long as we ourselves are the opposition, and in the 
minority. As soon as we have become the 
majority, and gained the power of government, our 
first act will be to abolish as far as you are con- 
cerned all that we formerly demanded for our- 
selves, viz., franchise, freedom of Press and of 
organisation, etc. 

The Theses respecting the Socialist Revolution 
are quite unequivocal on this point : 

(17) *' The former, demands for a democratic 
republic, and general freedom (that is freedom for 
the middle classes as well) were quite correct m 
the epoch that is now passed, the epoch of pre- 
paration and gathering of strength. The worker 
needed freedom for his Press, while the middle- 
class Press was noxious to him, but he could not 



THE NEW THEOKY 145 

at this time put forward a demand for the suppres- 
sion of the middle-class Press. Consequently, the 
proletariat demanded general freedom, even free- 
dom for reactionary assemblies, for black labour 
organisations. 

(18) '' Now we are in the period of the direct 
attack on capital, the direct overthrow and des- 
truction of the imperialist robber State, and the 
direct suppression of the middle class. It is there- 
fore absolutely clear that in the present epoch the 
principle of defending general freedom (that; is 
also for the counter-revolutionary middle class) is 
not only superfluous, but directly dangerous. 

(19) '* This also holds good for the Press, and 
the leading organisations of the social traitors. 
The latter have been unmasked as the active 
elements of the counter-revolution. They even 
attack with weapons the proletarian Government. 
Supported by former officers and the money bags 
of the defeated finance capital, they appear on the 
scene as the most energetic organisations for 
various conspiracies. The proletariat dictatorship 
is their deadly enemy. Therefore, they must be 
dealt with in a corresponding manner. 

(20) ''As regards the working class and the poor- 
peasants, these possess the fullest freedom. '^ 

Do they really possess the fullest freedom? 
The '* Social Traitors '* are proletarians and 



146 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PEOLETARIAT 

Socialists, too, but they offer opposition, and are 
therefore to be deprived of rights like the middle- 
class opposition. Would we not display the 
liveliest anger, and fight with all our strength in 
any case where a middle-class government 
endeavoured to employ similar measures against 
its opposition? 

Certainly we should have to do so, but our 
efforts would only have a laughable result if the 
middle-class government could refer to Socialist 
precepts like the foregoing, and a practice corre- 
sponding with them. 

How often have we reproached the Liberals 
that they are different in Government from what 
they are in opposition, and that then they abandon 
all their democratic pretensions. Now the Liberals 
are at least sufficiently prudent to refrain from the 
formal abandonment of any of their democratic 
demands. They act according to the maxim; on^ 
does this, but does not say so. 

The authors of the Theses are undeniably more 
honourable; whether they are wiser may be 
doubted. What would be thought of the wisdom 
of the German Social Democrats, if they openly 
announced that the democracy, for which they 
fight to-day, would be abandoned the day^ after 
victory. That they have perverted their demo- 
cratic principles to their opposites, or that they 



THE NEW THEORY 147 

have no democratic principles at all; that demo- ' 
cracy is merely a ladder for them, up which to 
climb to governmental omnipotence, a ladder they 
will no longer need, and will push away, as soon as 
they have reached the top, that, in a word, they 
are revolutionary opportunists. 

Even for the Eussian revolutionaries it is a 
short-sighted policy of expediency, if they adopt 
the method of dictatorship, in order to gain 
power, not to save the jeopardised democracy, but 
in order to maintain themselves in spite of it. 
This is quite obvious. 

On the other hand, it is less obvious why some 
German Social Democrats who are not yet in power, 
who furthermore only at the moment represent a 
weak opposition, accept this theory. Instead of 
seeing something which should be generally con- 
demned in the method of dictatorship, and the 
disfranchising of large sections of the people, which 
at the most is only defensible as a product of the 
exceptional conditions prevailing in Eussia, they 
go out of their way to praise this method as ;i 
condition which the German Social Democracy 
should also strive to reahse. 

This assertion is not only thoroughly false, it 
is in the highest degree destructive. If gener- 
ally accepted, it would paralyse the propagandist 
strength of our party to the utmost, for, with 



148 DICTATORSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT 

the exception of a small handful of sectarian 
fanatics, the entire German, as also the whole 
proletariat of the world, is attached to the 
principle of general democracy. The proletariat 
would angrily repudiate every thought of 
beginning its rule with a new privileged class, and 
a new disfranchised class. It would repudiate 
every suggestion of coupling its demand for 
general rights for the whole people with a mental 
reservation, and in reality only strive for privileges 
for itself. And not less would it repudiate the 
comic insinuation of solemnly declaring now that 
its demand for democracy is a mere deceit. 

Dictatorship as a form of government in Eussia 
is as understandable as the former anarchism of 
Bakunin. But to understand it does not mean that 
we should recognise it ; we must reject the former 
as decisively as the latter. The dictatorship does 
not reveal itself as a resource of a Socialist Party 
to secure itself in the sovereignty which has been 
gained in opposition to the majority of the people, 
but only as means of grapphng with tasks which 
are beyond its strength, and the solution of which 
exhausts and wears it; in doing which it only too 
easily compromises the ideas of Socialism itself, 
the progress of which it impedes rather than 
assists. 



THE NEW THEOKY 149 

Happily, the failure of the dictatorship is not 
synonymous with a collapse of the Revolution. It 
would be so only if the Bolshevist dictatorship was 
the mere prelude to a middle-class dictator- 
ship. The essential achievements of the Revolu- 
tion will be saved, if dictatorship is opportunely 
replaced by democracy. 



Printed by the National Labour Press, Ltd., 30, Blackfriars Stieet, 
^ Manchester and at London, 29916 



